He suggests the reason may be a combination of several factors based on the erosion in social and civic engagement — coupled with economic insecurity.
Nearly everyone who stopped by the show sampled a glass or two of our beer. As we handed them out we had a lot of great conversation with people wanting to know about real beer. We were somewhat surprised with all of the positive feedback, as this was an extremely hoppy and somewhat bitter beer – the largest amount of hops we have ever used in any of our recipes.
Don’t bury me here it’s too cold
No — yet still stedfast, still unchangeable,
So 1927 passed by with a bang, and a successful session was in the bag. I was really happy with it. In past years my D&D players would hem and haw when I suggested something like Cthulhu, but they would soon be requesting it over D&D after they saw how fun it was. I think my current group could well feel the same. I’m really looking forward to more of this!
On the photo shoot day we decided that the usual update images were not what was wanted and so we added a few props which Hannah had brought along with her. We spent some time going through the various poses before deciding upon several that we all liked. At first Hannah was a little shy about be photographed in the nude but she soon got over this and,judging from the comments that I have received from both her and Gary, they are overjoyed with the images that we got on the day.
On average, how many people would say still pay for a release when given the option to download for free?
Well, I believe I can get off my soap box for now. Next week I will start on the Act 2 planets. Thank you for reading. I hope this series has been helpful, or at least entertaining.
So my advice to other writers and illustrators when faced with a daunting revision is this: try everything that people suggest (especially if they are other writers, editors or agents), even if at first it doesn’t ring true to your feelings about your story. You owe it to yourself and your story to try new approaches and flip everything upside down. You never know where revisions will take you, and if you don’t like your new manuscript, you can always go back to your original version. But if your experience is anything like mine, you won’t!
Physically, Yoda is unremarkable. He doesn’t have the long, beautiful coats that my other three boys (Tibbs, Zoro, and Bear) have. His tail is ordinary – not a pom-pom like Mr. Tibbs or full squirrel brushes like Zoro and Bear. He does have a unique way of carrying his tail. He lifts it so high that it arches over his back and the tip actually brushes his neck. It gives him a proud presence and conceals nothing of his “business.” My favorite part of Yoda’s body is his stomach. It is white, except for a small, off-center patch of tan with black spots. His tummy looks like vanilla ice cream, studded with a single chunk of chocolate-chip cookie dough. When he rolls on his back, I crave Ben and Jerry’s.
Murakami has never struck me as a great singer, so this was going to be an uphill battle for him in the first place. There was an opening for him, though – the karaoke computer didn’t quite agree with our ears in terms of his challenger’s singing. With renewed hope, he went for it:
“One only has to drive past the designated travelling sites on Rover Way and Shirenewtown, located an acceptable distance away from residential areas, to witness the lack of respect that is demonstrated towards the area.”
A lost note long played
a comfy place to stretch out
I am laying on the floor, when Hubby comes and tries to steamroll me.
SO that’s it. I’m going to do it. I’m going to organize my house. Yes, all of it. The whole dang thing. We’ve lived here for 2 and a half years, it’ll be 3 at the end of May. I never really organized it when we first moved in and we’ve been slowly rearranging things the way we like them and they look a little better than when we first moved in. Not totally great though so I am challenging myself to get all the way organized!! I can do it. I know I can! It’s just the daunting task of organizing the whole house AND keeping it organized that worries me.
Gregory: Romney is pretty weak considering
Baby, give it to you
This sounds cold and cruel, and I thought in writing this I would elicit the emotional response I have come to expect of myself with such things. But a truly new and rather unsettling me is emerging. Surely, I blubbered and stumbled and asked Nick to find me another solution. But at their death I was able to keep in check and not allow myself to think about their little faces and their little souls. I write this, not with pride, nor with peace, just with a vaguely deadened realization that I cannot save every creature that comes to me. That I don't have the space, in my heart nor in my body to help them all. And I, quite honestly, hate that. I am not at peace with this. Yet, I know I need be. I know my past actions cannot be sustained on our future farms. I know I will need to pick the battles more wisely.
Devin and Orion Martin
I will give you 3 principles you can live by that you can apply to a relationship or this things maybe happening to you to help you and prevent you from getting used:
just breathe.
Let me warn you though, hanging on to the word isn’t always easy. The devil knows that if he doesn’t steal it from you, you’ll use it to enforce his defeat. So don’t be surprised if he sends an evil spirit to exalt itself against the Word of God. If you’re sick, he may begin to tell you, you’re not healed. You know that healing’s not for today.
4 tsp baking powder
Erin Brown ... Theatre patron
And another classmate, Phillip Maxwell, who witnessed the hair-cutting incident, told CBS today: “Mitt was a prankster, there’s no doubt about it. This thing with Lauber wasn’t a prank. This was, well, as a lawyer, it was an assault. It was an assault and a battery. And I’m sure that John Lauber carried it with him for the rest of his life.”
I began collecting CDs, and saw the faces of Brasil, understood the
The Prophet (pbuh) used to visit the people in their gatherings during season days (Hajj and Umra) and other days (too). He used to go to their market places, recite the Qur'an, invite them to Allah, the Most Respectful, the AllMajestic. He used to say, "Who will give me a safe shelter, and who will support me till I convey the Message of my Lord (Allah) then he will have Paradise." But he would not find anyone to support him or to give him a safe shelter.
Looking all around me
Legs shuffle along a pockmarked sidewalk,
Min 26: “When I don’t see the numbers on that orange button go up, I don’t feel alive. Seriously, Sweet Mother, you need help.”
Richard von Sturmer / Working with Nagarjuna / 4-10
Of our own device……
It got me thinking about the curious double lives that some careerist chicks lead. This girl will probably go on to be a highly successful academic who will have the ability to influence thousands. She will do it on a campus that cultivates a deep aura of respect and responsibility. She will be expected to communicate with both men and women of high degrees and multiple accomplishments. If she has a family, she will be expected to do her best to be a role model to her children.
3. Fabric must be designer label, 100% cotton, quality fabric.
Location: Bothell, WA
6. Favorite food? salad, pizza, steak, egyptian food, sandwiches (including burgers).
Chips (2) - mmmmmmmm.... chiiiiips.
About 3:45, DGD6 called and gave me some kind of a message that I didn't quite get. I thought I was agreeing to watch her for a couple of hours, but instead her dad brought she and her sister by for a five minute "I love you, Grandma" visit on their way to some appointments. AND...they brought me a hamburger! You have no idea how good that tasted!!!
13. My Love, My Milk (Week-End Album New Mix)
I was left wondering why I had not watched this movie since last year. Despite crying, I did not find it a sad movie. It left me with a quiet, gentle peace that settled into my bones like a cup of hot tea. It made me look around for a Narf of my own. And it gave me a momentary vision of how to view the world.
If you refer a customer to me and they purchase a car, I will send you $200!
The most important of the bunch...be yielding. Love Jesus. Teach your family to love Jesus. Yield to God's leadership and Lordship over your home. He has great things in store for you and your family and there are blessings that come with rooting your home in Christ.
Q: (Sean McGreevy – CSMA Magazine) Fernando, this is a great way to celebrate 60 years since Ferrari’s first win, but what does today’s win mean to you personally and the team?
As a child, when people asked me what I wanted to be, I said a writer. If they pressed further I'd say I want to write in a big city. Didn't matter which one at the time--Chicago, New York, Los Angeles--I just wanted to be near the pulse that comes from an urban environment.
Cricut Cartridges - Printing Press and George & Basic Shapes (for the Hearts), the colorful circles and strips were leftover scraps from cutting labels using the Art Philosophy cartridge
To reduce costs and logistical head aches the only differences between the two jet powered aircraft would be airframes, sensors and mission software. The turboprop powered aircraft would have the additional difference of turboprops instead of jets. Using modular construction and advanced automotive manufacturing systems we could even build all three planes on the same assembly line. The modular design also makes upgrading the aircraft cheaper and easier.
I take solace in my crochet and knitting and movies and books. At least there I can live a rich fantasy life that I don't really have. I can laugh and cry and not at myself. I can destress without worrying if it's going to hurt someone else. I guess you could say I'm learning to love myself more. I'm learning to live with myself. I'm learning to accept my life for what it is. The only person who can make it better or different is me. It would be nice to have someone to share it with, but since you never seem to be around...I make do with what I have. I change the things I can. Yes, sometimes I get annoyed with the things I can't, but at least I am able to accept that there are some things in this world that I cannot change, as much as I want them to, it will never happen.
as a lamed veteran, the half of my brain not
"He maketh the storm a calm, so that the waves thereof are still.
German Chocolate Bars
Of course, once I started reading the recipe, I got a bit nervous. Pistachios? In dessert? I seriously contemplated swapping pistachios for something else, but Eric insisted that we needed to go big or go home with this recipe. So I reluctantly purchased a $10 can of pistachios (seriously, why are nuts so expensive?). Let me tell you, these things are awesome. Hands down, the best biscotti I’ve ever eaten. The pistachios are perfect. And we got enough nuts in that $10 can to serve up this recipe several more times, which you can be certain I will do. And since these cookies make an awesome dessert, breakfast, or afternoon snack (with a nice cup of coffee), I think we’ll go through them fast!
I know when I decided to start blogging, I felt just a wee bit apprehensive. Hopefully this initiative I read about, on one of the blogs that helped inspire me to start, is useful for anyone thinking about putting themselves out there. Head over to MMOGamerchick’s blog for more info.
I was practicing what our photo instructor, Dave Hoptman, try to drill into us during our one week with him in Tuscany. Basically how the vertical line should be vertical and how horizontal line should be horizontal.
Enter intervention, in the rugged form of punk rock star Henry Rollins. My best friend Ryan and I met Rollins and enjoyed the pleasure of listening to him rant brilliance in a hyper fury for 2 1/2 hours straight. During the show, Rollins recalled his response to a fan who asked about how to be successful. Rollins’ response included an exhortation to wake up at 4:30 am, run seven miles in the snow (if no snow, replace with buckets of ice), read five books, and write 3 dissertations before the day is done, every day. Exit complacency. Sure, my behavior was understandable; but if I can do better, what’s stopping me? Death waits for all, but life is for the taking.
4. What project(s) are you working on now?
Forty Guns
But when they dry up they leave behind these mean, nasty, tiny burrs that embed themselves into everything.... especially dog paws! Why is it that the snails don't eat these???
On the breast of my coat; and one by one
With a new release, Sins of Your Forefathers, San Francisco Poet and Activist Sellassie carved his niche as a leading progressive voice in Bay Area Hip Hop. His energy and authenticity easily set him apart as an upcoming force delivering revolutionary hip hop aimed to change the world.
Joe Bushkin’s exuberant piano style was developed in the pioneer days of American Jazz, and he raised the roof of every club and concert hall around the world that was lucky enough to host one of his selectively rare performances.
As an only child, I thought of Beau as the little brother I never had. He spooned with me on my bed, snored like none other, and sat next to me when I was sad. I felt such comfort snuggling next to him and nuzzling my face in his soft ears. I would often say, “I see God in Beau, because he shows unconditional love and true companionship in an inexplicable way.” To me, that love epitomizes what I believe is God’s love for us.
So we set off down Corrientes, Philippe knew of a place opposite the Abasto called El Rey. He was a bit more reliable and the place was there, and open. It was Chilean food, but somehow we ended up with Pollo Entero again.
Scholar Memela does serious violence to the legacy of Biko with “To paraphrase Biko: ‘Coconut is non-white. And black is black’.” He has not paraphrased. He has distorted what Biko said and also undermined the spirit of the cause Biko rightly fought for: freedom for the oppressed, equality and no discrimination.
My cousins called me this because they said I was pikon. I thought I wasn’t. Enraged, I fired back at my cousin Annika and called her Petrang Kabayo, then I realized pikon nga ako.
Before I even start thinking about buying another sewing machine, however, I want to run it past you, as I do all my big purchases. You're probably asking yourself, "Doesn't Peter have a working treadle?" Well, yes, I have a working treadle, but suppose I have to change locations in a hurry. Am I going to roll my treadle down to the barge, donkey cart, or mule train as I evacuate the big city? It would be much simpler to carry a portable 35 lb. Singer hand crank, don't you think? If I can't sew, how can I blog?
Q. Yeah, Alcohol'll do that to you. Do you think that it makes sense going home with a guy you don't even know? And just to let you know, his name's not Dillon.
Rather than letting the damaged fences go to waste, Oliveira peels off layers of wood and uses the pieces as ‘brush strokes’ to form his large-scale installations. As he secures each strip, the layers build up and create organic curves and coils that burst through gallery walls and wind through space in amorphous forms. From afar, they can appear to be soft and smooth, but a closer look will find a series of raw edges that guarantee a splinter upon the touch.
Binks requires a headcount, so please RSVP
She seem'd a splendid angel, newly drest,
Here is the basket saw from the top!! For the bouquet I used some Wild Orchid Craft flowers and on it a bit of Stickles!!
Community facilities, no prob
Mr Pyne confirms the meeting took place but says he can “not remember” asking for Mr Ashby’s mobile number.
It’s a simple corner in our dining room. There are no markings, no cutesie arrows pointing the way, no carpet set on the floor. And, even though it sounds dreadful, it’s really not.
As flaming pheasant passes by
The big event is almost underway, folks! The first training exercise goes live at midnight MDT. And we're kicking things off with some fun and giveaways.
So Teagan and I headed to JCPenny. And she helped me pick out and try on a few things. Had a couple outfit options that I liked and then Teagan found The Dress. I found a large black belt to go with it. Dress- $40. Belt- $15.
The downside is that once you get on speed, the wheel feels less organic, slightly numb to the touch. This does take away a wee-bit of confidence, especially during highway bends. Otherwise, the Z.E. is actually great fun to drive in the urban landscape with wholesome amount of torque on tap.
If one gets out of step with the EDiM Challenge as I just have, it's a struggle to catch up.
yet this new sensation is nice...
“I don’t think so, not for long, anyway”
And it helps that I was single. There was no spouse or child to consider. No collaboration. I finally got glad about that instead of just wondering why I hadn't found love yet. It would come in time. But back then, it was just me, thinking of the magic number 108 and my freedom dreams.
(the extended family is also a Vietnamese concept, I think–and one that is very lacking from a lot of genre books. I really should do stats on which protagonists have living parents and/or siblings, and move from there to uncles and aunts and parents’ friends…)
this time. Therefore, I will assume the position of assistant professor
Nutrition: My diet is pretty simple: I have green juice first thing in the morning, then a green smoothie mid-morning, a big ol' salad for lunch with an avocado and a sprinkle of a handfull of nuts, and a blended green soup for dinner. In the smoothie I add chia seeds and goji berries and a superfood powder called "super reds" that has everything from goji berries, acai, beet powder, blue berries and probiotics. In the blended soup it is half greens (and I am rotating my greens better!) and the other half tomato, carrot, celery, onion, lots of garlic, more chia, and VitaMineral Green. (The garlic and chia are for my cholesterol reduction program.)
I will be exhibiting at the 54th annual Art Fair on the Square show in Madison, Wisconsin this year, July 14-15, 2012. It is put on by the Madison Museum of Contemporary Art.
“No. It makes perfect sense. Torgmoor is at least four days to the northwest.”
Don’t let Fuad’s politicking distract you folks….this matter was never about Miller’s mental health…it was about whether the state had abused its power in dealing with a public servant.
This along with other new products and redesigned signs will be on the website soon.
I love Snoopy to bits so when Born Pretty contacted me last month asking me to review some of their nail art products I immediately said yes I have been really slack at doing any nail art the last few months so I was really excited to try their Nail Art Water Decals they sent me eleven different designs but my favs were definitely Snoopy and The Smurfs, The decals were really easy too apply just like the temporary tattoos I used to get when I was a kid, I decided to do holo snoopy nails and applied the decals over Make Up Store Greta I really love this mani and don't know if I ever want to remove snoopy he is so cute!
At least I have ushered in my own diagnosis of mental lapses, waning memory and off the wall emotions. So what is their excuse?
How Long? Oh! Wandering lost soul!
Emma and I walked around the block this morning. It was pretty chilly again, but nice to be out.
So what kind of driving traits should you look for then?
The Bafana team were able to match Ghana for pace but not in strength as they were starved of possession by the Black Stars.
So, since you folks haven't seen me anywhere near as much, your opinion will be less bias than my own.
I love to work with pattern papers and using bright colors. I love to embellish my pages using stickers, chipboard, journaling die cuts, buttons, punches and some hand stitching. My favorite technique is fussy cutting. Sometimes, I like to distress my papers, and occasionally use glimmer mist, COPICS and stamps. My hobbies other than scrapbooking, are walking/jogging, reading and spending time with my family. Most of my time is spent commuting back and forth between school and my kids extracurricular activities.
I want the answer to be something other than “When I remove her from my life.” That future doesn’t seem bright anymore.
February 25, 1935 (Monday): I smoked the pipe but it was bad-tasting.
Dr Rich Snyder, DO is the author of What You Must Know About Kidney Disease: A Practical Guide to Using Conventional and Complementary Treatments. He is the host of the radio show Improve Your Kidney Health on the Voice America Health & Wellness Channel.
Earth Day gets a bit overshadowed here because it's daughter Rosie's birthday. (Happy 9th Birthday Rose!) Maybe we'll have to celebrate it next year properly a week behind or in advance next year, since Earth Day is an important day to reflect.
I just dry hopped my Xtra Pale Ale with 1 ounce of Cascade. The hops are suspended from the airlock in two tea infusers. This should keep the hops in contact with beer and not fall to the bottom.
“Slayer fans everywhere – it’s time to let you know what is going on with our brother Jeff Hanneman. As you know, Jeff was bitten by a spider more than a year ago, but what you may not have known was that for a couple of days after he went to the ER, things were touch-and-go. There was talk that he might have to have his arm amputated, and we didn’t know if he was going to pull through at all. He was in a medically-induced coma for a few days and had several operations to remove the dead and dying tissue from his arm. So, understand, he was in really, really bad shape. It’s been about a year since he got out of the hospital, and since then, he had to learn to walk again, he’s had several painful skin grafts, he’s been in rehab doing exercises to regain the strength in his arm; but best of all, he’s been playing guitar. We were all excited when he joined us onstage for the encore a year ago at The Big Four show at Coachella (see photo below).
In 2011 Red Bull clearly split this part up into several smaller Battery Packs, there being the two aforementioned units either of the gearbox and another in the gearbox. Although interconnecting these parts with cooling pipes, high current cable and sensor cabling adds some weight, this does provide a nicer packaging solution. It’s logical to explain these new floor mounted parts as batteries. However they do not look like the battery packs seen in the gearbox last year, or on other cars. Being on the floor of the car they are subject to even more danger from impacts as well as the heat and vibration that caused issues last year.
One of my friends watched the video on facebook and and commented that Jasper looks "broke". Someone else commented on how it looks like I'm not hanging on for dear life anymore. It made me realize that for the first time I'm not questioning IF he's going to jump or not, and then frantically grabbing mane as he launches himself 2 or 3 feet higher than the top of the jump. I'm now assuming he's going over and am able to wait for him to figure out his distances and let him jump.
after i was
Acrobats, jugglers, and animals acts are common to both the circus and vaudeville, but here’s the difference between the two forms of theatre: in the circus such performers are royalty; in the vaudeville of yore they were second and third class citizens. This is a distinction that’s been blurred since the 1970s, when the first wave of so-called New Vaudevillians came in — acts that were far more evocative of and representative of, the circus than vaudeville. (Non-verbal clowns might be considered an exception. Some were stars in vaudeville, certainly — but just as certainly they are not unique to, or representative of, vaudeville.)
Rating 26
And ya know. It just makes me think. Yesterday I was posting asking for prayer because of my struggles. Today I post because of happiness of a mind renewal having occurred.
That's an outline of the path the sound follows. But there's more to a synth than that. Remember there are also ways to shape how a sound evolves over time? These next few items control how that happens. Typically you'll find one or more Low Frequency Oscillators (LFOs).
Everyone in this planet eat chicken at least 2-3 times a week I bet.., except those who are vegetarians, or those who witnessed the murdering of chicken.
- 4 Melitta World Harvest Organic coffee
Who spent her married life bitterly opposed to all my dad's relatives even visiting our home.
As John Lennon would say, today is a “red lettuce” day in the history of Linda and Reid. On this date, 35 years ago, we formally amalgamated our households and our lives by moving into a small house at 729 Lorette Avenue in Winnipeg. Since we had fallen madly in love, the move was inevitable. It was an usually hot April day, at least for back then, as the temperature soared into the 80s. Sweat was pouring off us and my friend Ted who helped with the move but we managed to clear out two apartments and find space for our combined stuff in the little house.
Like a vision she dances across the porch
Too much talking is the result of too little listening. People who don’t feel heard frequently talk more. Admittedly, some clam up. But, those with passion usually talk more.
there is a slight breeze in the air
So potentially I want ignored and a second message, founder handbag for a man.
That's why it's hardly strange that there's a little flower called 'Afrikaner'- because indeed we are as fragile as flowers: here one moment, and gone the next.
The backlash was also effective, and a few weeks ago, SOPA began to break down. The private right of action disappeared first, then the part about severing domain names from websites that so many feared would have broken the internet. Soon after, an amendment was offered that would let the search engines off the hook completely. (Google, presumably, feels better now.) Barely more than 24 hours later, with a strong message sounding from the White House sounding the background, the bill was shelved until there was “Consensus” in Congress, which everyone who knows anything about Congress reasonably believed meant until the fulfillment of the prophecies. But that was three whole days ago, and today we learned that Consensus may come in February, or at least that will be when Congress takes SOPA down from the shelf and starts marking it up again.
Lest we forget.
I cut him at 2.5"...a little smaller than the recommended 3" and I had to cut him a few times to get it to cut without tearing the paper. I attached all his wing layers with foam tape for dimension.
I didn't even use a mixer, just stir the mixture with a wooden spoon. It was low in fat and also egg free. The classic pairing is chocolate and vanilla but there are so many more possibilities. This is my new favorite cake, it turned out wonderfully, very moist and tasty!
After browsing pinterest for sunroom inspiration, I've decided to skip the typical white ceiling and go with something a little more exciting...
Rolo Cafe
Since the balls kept trying to pop off the stick (causing me much anger and frustration) I spooned the chocolate on the balls rather than dunking. I didn't get a nice clean look, but at least I got it on there successfully!
Number two, give in. Because her friends outnumbered her, and she had already been left out of certain events because she hadn’t responded fast enough to a text. (Actually, that rudeness alone would be reason enough for me to edge away from those “friends”.)
I thought about dolling it up some more by adding a bow or small stuffed animal or something else but honestly, I just liked the simplicity of it.
Besides making me feel very grateful for where I live (and slightly guilty for feeling grateful) the questions sounded familiar. I heard an echo of Jesus’ words from Luke 14. You know the passage. Jesus spins around to the people following him and says, “Are you sure you want to do this?”
Here is a fairly recent release but I am not really certain to the extent of which this material was made available or how many of this demo actually made it into the hands of folks so I figured why not share it. Risk, not to be confused with the band from the mid west this Risk is a four piece that resides in Brooklyn but two of the members were originally from Long Island and each in their own ways played significant roles in making Long Island DIY what it was in the late 90s/early 00s. Guitarist/vocalist Jay Melli was in bands such as Scent of Human History, Sometimes Walking Sometimes Running, United States, Jan Cux, etc while guitarist/vocalist Bryan Winston was a part of making the Long Island Freespace a reality.
We drover to Jiayuguan on the Silk Road, the place where in the old days merchants would take their goods and bring them to the next towns. The Silk Road went from ancient Rome in the old days, to Xi’an in that time sometimes the capital of China. Jiayuguan is a fortress that was built in between two mountains to block the barbarians – aka some Mongolians – from getting into China. And there’s the beginning of the Great Wall there.
Further, exemptions under Section 8(1) were not absolute and subject to larger public interest as mentioned in Section 8(2) which reads, “Notwithstanding any of the exemptions permissible in accordance with sub section (1), a public authority may allow access to information if public interest in disclosure outweighs the harm to protected interest.” In other words, the concept of public interest could not be invoked for denial of information. On the other hand, an exempted
lipping! = I'm slipping!
That’s right 80,000 people!
7% like to see one polish at a time
Parents aren’t the only ones who struggle with their addiction. Their children have to witness and become victims of their side effects and may go to extremes in attempts to cope. A study by the Women and Children’s Health Network shows that children of addicts react to their parents being on drugs in different ways. They may try extra hard to win their parents approval, focus on school or other activities to escape the problems at home, they may avoid going home altogether, or have behavioral problems that focus the attention on them as opposed to the parents problem. More extreme cases have shown that children have turned to self harm, engage in activities that disregard their safety, and may become withdrawn and end up overlooked and ignored.
Once upon a time trees ruled the earth and is one of the reason why life is still on earth
Senior year is over, and Lucy has the perfect way to celebrate: tonight, she's going to find Shadow, the mysterious graffiti artist whose work appears all over the city. He's out there somewhere—spraying color, spraying birds and blue sky on the night—and Lucy knows a guy who paints like Shadow is someone she could fall for. Really fall for. Instead, Lucy's stuck at a party with Ed, the guy she's managed to avoid since the most awkward date of her life. But when Ed tells her he knows where to find Shadow, they're suddenly on an all-night search around the city. And what Lucy can't see is the one thing that's right before her eyes. -- Expected publication: February 14th 2012
Such a theory has much going for it when one considers the behaviours of mankind both historically and indeed today, indeed is it not the case that countries, which are in reality merely social groups, have standing armies of varying sizes and strengths, all kept in reserve to enforce a particular orthodoxy. Today we see the gradual, although accelerating, rush to global governance, to a one-world planet, the dream of leftists since their very conception by Jewry, yet in order for such to occur one must do away with all notion of nation and therefore of nationalism, indeed one must destroy utterly all binding creeds and belief systems, instil within all the doctrine of sameness, of uniformity, of dare I say it, equality. Today equality has come to be seen as a good thing, as a humanitarian thing, as a creed in its own right to be fought for and in some cases, to kill or be killed for, yet the equality of today bears little comparison with the equality of yesteryear, indeed should egalitarians have their way then the world shall succumb to an endless blackness and we are in twilight now.
Planned Release Date
I sent out about countless job applications to websites and magazines asking the naive question of, "Hi, I like to write. How do I write for you?" Brash and completely unprofessional? Definitely. But worth the embarrassment to get my question answered? Absolutely. I had no idea how to get into this business, and I knew I had to start somewhere.
Very high on my want list at the moment - Louis side chairs. I only need 4 of them for my dining room because I've also got it in my head that some more substantial wing chairs in a fab upholstery job would look good on the ends of the table. Stalking of my local Craig's List has turned up exactly ZERO chairs.
One World Trade Center, formerly the Freedom Tower before that name was deemed too showy and patriotic, is a faintly shiny presence on the skyline, glass slowly sliding over stories of naked steel, overshadowed by Frank Gehry's strikingly surreal Beekman Tower with its rippling lines. If you didn't know what you were looking at, you would hardly notice it was there.
Bake blind for 15 minutes
This will help the cabbages not to dry out. Let them soak in salt for 45 minutes.
25. Black and White -Argosy All-Story Weekly 4 parts Oct 2, 9, 16, 23
Do know what else to say. He has been referred to as the best quarterback coming out of college since John Elway. And that man was pretty damn good. Not to mention he led the Broncos two Super Bowls. So Colt fans get excited.
This blog attempts to chronicle the extreme violence and secret genocide being committed against the white minority of South Africa. Tens of thousands of whites have been murdered since 1994. Brutal torture and rape is common and not even the young or elderly are spared. Quotes: "Kill the Boer, Kill the Farmer" - Peter Mokaba (ANC). "When Mandela dies we will kill you whites like flies" - Mzukizi Gaba (ANC). "We the members of MK have pledged ourselves to kill them, the whites" - Nelson Mandela.
What the new downward market pressure on the RMB does indicate, however, is that Chin for so long a no-brainer destination for investment has turned into a big question mark. And it suggests that at least some domestic Chinese investors who have been inclined to sock their money into empty villas and condos or big stockpiles of raw materials are now looking for a way out.
“Simon, Simon, Satan has asked to sift all of you as wheat. But I have prayed for you, Simon, that your faith may not fail. And when you have turned back, strengthen your brothers.” (Luke 22:31–32 )
I had not realized the connection before… how Downton Abbey could have a certain degree of separation from King Tut. But the book soon ends with the sad news that the already weak Lord Carnarvon soon succumbed to illness. He died in Cairo at age 57, just a few months after the excavation. It’s noted in the book that at the time of his death, back at Highclere Castle in the night, his beloved terrier Susie howled once and died.
The events in Indonesia during the 1950s and 1960s is a debacle of the U.S. promotion of liberalism, its ultra-aggressive campaign against the spread of communism, and its paranoid take over the domino theory. In retrospect, the U.S. became an imperialist nation not through direct colonization, but through vague channels which utilized multinational companies to manipulate and disseminate unrest among the Indonesians—a series of action that eventually lead to Indonesians killing their compatriots, all in the name of the almighty "national interest" of the United States of America and its crusade for liberty, equality, and the pursuit of happiness.
Ginger- Garlic paste – 1 Tsp
The West Lot Pirates preview the Northwestern Spring Game and talk about some of the players returning for the 2012 season. You can download the episode directly from here.
This little game seems to be leading to more and smarter dialog than you might expect.
I can not. You see I love words; a well written book is a joy out of this world(Tolstoy, Turgenev, Gogol and so many more I believe are such great word wizards), but to describe such a holy time of the year I think the use of words does not do it justice. Now that I think, maybe that is why The Passion was such great movie: very little words. I can not help but think that we are robbing Christmas of its magic by trying to describe it. We can not do much by using mortal means (language) to describe immortal truths. That is why I love Christmas traditions like The Creche and the fact that it started with St. Francis ("Preach the gospel always. When necessary use words"). It makes it more magical, more beautiful (you see, all these description words can not do the job well enough). Because I can not describe all the feelings that Christmas brings into my hearth I can only describe traditions and how we as humans live and do Christmas.
1/2 cup cold buttermilk
Who am I that You should notice,
Shannon looks around and tells the operator the intersecting streets.
You found out that this sales candidate is self-motivated (Sales Manager Role No.3.) This makes it easier for the sales manager who can leave him/her alone more than most others on the sales team.
eastsides perfect gathering spot. Putting the spotlight on
Announcements and Offerings
The first thing to do, and today’s job, is to establish an idea of the man himself. What better way than to show you things that Stravinsky himself said? Here is a man of the Race That Knows Joseph.
But what are the long-term implications of cheapening discipleship? In the short run, it may make us more attractive and popular — like a diploma mill granting degrees to anyone who pays the fee. We can achieve our growth goals without raising expectations or developing standards of accountability. All we have to do is change our language, and viola — members become disciples, attendees become disciples, and regular visitors become disciples — the church grows!
This free association thinking lead me to myself. My body. . . My body is like the earth. I have seas of water, soil growing new tissue, an atmosphere that renews and cleanses itself, my cells perform a form of photosynthesis, and I have seasons. Last spring, the time of the heart, I was sad. Lonely. I longed for more human connections. I felt the need and urges to ground myself after a long, intense winter of the mind. As I moved into summer I essentially shut my mind off and lived fully in my body. I ran and played and drank lots of beer and sang and laughed, behaved like an animal doing just whatever I felt like, grazing as I wished, storing up vitamin D in my skin, muscles on my bones, joy in my heart, and fat in my brain (as I didn't call on it to work much). As the fall approached I felt the shift. The dog days of summer were over. The time of the club and foot had ended. The leaves are now falling in spades and I am feeling a wealth of abundance from my harvest. I feel sharp. and ready to dig deeper.
In a May 2, 2006 interview, Murphy pointed to hidden evidence (that, in fact, didn’t exist and that the police and Nifong had never claimed existed). Dismissing test results that indicated no DNA matches to any of the lacrosse players, Murphy asserted that “the broomstick DNA has not yet been revealed.” The only problem: there was no “broomstick DNA,” since even the mentally imbalanced Mangum had never claimed an assault by broomstick.
This year Ronnie made a special request on her list and has been asking me for weeks if I think there might be any chance that she might get what she asked for, so......we have a new member to our family. It's not a baby but you can still cuddle and love it and we still have to potty train it. His name is Gizmo and he is the sweetest little boy ever. The look on her face is priceless. I was so happy that we could make it happen for her.
2. My father was a bit of a pussy in tracking down leads for me, so it looks like I”m going to have to take matters into my own hands there. He has a colleague who has a daughter, who used to be an editor for now-defunct Madmoiselle magazine. The colleague didn’t offer up his daughter’s contact info and my Dad is too gentile to be so forward as to ask, so I’m going to call up the guy my damn self … sometime next week.
Daily winners will receive an email within 24 hours of the blog frenzy’s closing. The winners will have 72 hours to reply to that email to claim prize. If a winner fails to respond within 72 hours, a new winner will be drawn.
Screw those cars. Seriously. Take your shirt off. Take that thing off. Take it off. Right the hell now. Mom? Mom! Mom! MOOOOOMMMMM!
The infallible promise
11 ounces / 300 grams mixed mushrooms, (try including shiitake, reishi, or maitake) wiped clean
“You will wait — and wait — in check-in and security lines, likely wait again for your luggage,” it said about JFK.
With all that craziness, there's been little time to write or blog or breathe. But! I promise, I will have more next weekend. My husband is driving across the country, leaving me alone for 6 days (3x the longest we've been apart since our wedding). Loneliness is a great motivator for me and I should get tons done. Or I'll just watch a lot of SyFy.
Yum! It was fun putting the toppings on the soup and eating it that way. Hope you enjoy this!
Rather is a true “bitter clinger”, clinging to his partisan, propaganda and Leftist ideology that Bush is evil, Bush is a fraud, Bush is guilty. No other ‘facts’ are required but that George W Bush, and all Republicans/ Conservatives, are guilt by ideology and Party affiliation. This is the reason Rather was run out of his job – an outraged public that forced Rather to hit the ‘goodbye’ road.
Have you experienced those “frustrating” people who turned out to be wise, after all?
With the torpedo device, there is a known quantity of hops used in the thing, and it can be used with a big volume of beer. Requiring less hops by volume, with a BIG difference in imparted flavors.So there you go. In other regards, the beer is a pretty standard IPA: 17.8 P and 7.2% alcohol, 70 IBUs, Carapils and crystal malt. The brewery's really hanging their hat on the Citras.
Wired Campus
“My parents’ small business doesn’t yield much. So to ease their burden, I have managed to live on my own since my junior year in college. …My plan A is to be a full-time journalist, because providing credible information to people and exposing social injustice would make my life meaningful. Plan B is to take another profession that permits me to live a decent life, and to be a citizen journalist at the same time.”
What you should do when you upgrade your service is to make it simpler, and while you may think you have done that wordpress, you haven’t, you’ve just made it more awkward.
So, it is not difficult to see how our commitment to success can be aided by team play—a relationship where we rejoice in the differences each team member brings to the table, a relationship that is open and transparent to clearly define expectations, and a relationship that is based on unrelenting trust. Be it the team play between a husband and wife in a marital setup, friendship, sports, or professionals at work—this is one prescription that universally works.
The saga of Specsavers v Asda has been told thrice already on this weblog, once when it turned out that the defendant's lawyers couldn't prepare their client's case because they were busy filling their client's shelves (see here and here), once when the trial judge got it mainly wrong and once when the Court of Appeal got it more or less right and referred some questions to the Court of Justice of the European Union (CJEU) for a preliminary ruling, to be on the safe side..
Ink: Black Onyx (Versafine), Old Olive (SU), Versamark
I walked away from the accident with just bruises and a bloody hand and elbow. I was thankful that I did not hit my head or hurt my neck or back through the accident. The Lord really protected me.
A NEW Cybersmart subscriber who has been with Cybersmart for less than six months and subscribes to Grow For Life will grow their cap at 1 Mb per day for life.
■Cost: $180 w/Free shipping (save $26.33)
He then put his tools down and went off on a tirade about how people say they’re going to buy the place, but when it comes time to put money down, they back out. I don’t know how that would have prevented him from completing his work on the lot, but he was pretty riled up, so I didn’t ask.
February 4, 2011 (Saturday) 6:00 PM KST
After the race we took the train back to our car and headed home. One of the best things about running in the rain is peeling off your wet clothes and hopping into a hot shower to warm up when you get home. Ahhh... This might actually be the only good thing about running in the rain! Clean, dry and warm - it was time to get haircuts, run a few errands and grab a quick lunch. Then we headed over to the car dealership and bought a new car (are you tired yet?). We celebrated with a little ice cream, ran a few more errands and then took a lap around the Mall of America to get a little energy out (we're pretty psyched about the new car) - picking up a few necessities while we were at it (ultra low shoe liners and a foot file - if you must know). We finished up with a quick dinner and now, here we are, home at last. Dash has missed us and we are ready to snuggle up with him and a good book or a favorite movie to end our day.
it's been so busy here this spring,
A few hours earlier, 300 leagues from Breslau, a baby had been born in Ajaccio. A baby who would be called Napoleon Bonaparte.
"This war," Sergeant Cooper said, "weapons barely matter."
On a much lighter note, I finished my second Nanowrimo a whopping six days early! I cannot tell you how excited I was - and I beat my friend Claire, who finished two days later. It was awesome to have a noveling buddy, let me tell you. More competition. Nerd competition, may I add. We were slinging novel-related threats at each other all month.
Without meaning to digress into bleating about other Instagram viewers for iPad, many of them have showed promise, but failed to deliver in terms of substance. Once iPad users have gotten over the fact they could view Instagram on their iPad, the next step is usually to delete the rather restricted app from their home screen. Not today.
During the latter 1950s and early 1960s the Growler was stationed secretly off the Pacific Coast of the Soviet Union. It was Cold War time, and she would have been first-response if the Soviets were found to be planning a nuclear offensive.
In 1977 The All New Super Friends Hour debuted, with the hour divided into four segments. The first segment would feature two superheroes, the second segment featured the Wonder Twins, the third segment used all the Super Friends to save the day and the final segment featured one superhero and a guest star, showing off their unique super ability.
The orange macarons, we realise, are sandwiched with foie gras, whipped with a splash of Pig Flyin's favourite whisky and a little bit of butter. The cream-coloured macarons have been filled with mascarpone combined with porcini powder - and a little butter of course.
There are lots of goodies to get with this package and it's truly at a steal of a deal price for custom photography!
Two books from Book Depository that include the words "Love", "Valentine" or "Cupid". Value up to $18.00.
Chicken Tikka Masala has a long and complicated history that has undefined origins and vague specifications for “traditional recipe.” You know what? If you really want to read about it click here. Unfortunately for Weight Watchers members, Indian food isn’t the healthiest thing that ever roamed the planet, so generally, I avoid it. Until…I discovered Coconut Creamer by So Delicious. So Delicious is a brand of all natural, dairy free coconut milk based out of Eugene, OR. Woo-hoo! LOCAL- I love it.
Despite having a lovely time with said boy, his lack of contact got too much. Nearly 3 months in and he still hadn't been to visit me, perfectly content as he was to let me make all the effort. I finally confronted him today and was told the distance was too much, blah, blah, blah and could we still be friends. Er, no thanks!
Place bulgur wheat in a medium bowl and pour boiling water over it. Cover with saran wrap and let sit for 20-30 minutes for the water to be absorbed, while working on assembling the rest of the ingredients.
Christmas Hurdle at Kempton. His father rode in the Grand National several times, enjoying his best placing when Attitude
Yer just gonna have to trust me on this.
Anyone who gets married that many times obviously believes in marriage.
Fifty-six percent of those charged with a reentry offense had previously been convicted of a violent or drug-related felony. By contrast, under half of those charged with alien smuggling, a third of those charged with unlawful entry, and just over a quarter those charged with misuse of visas and other charges had previously been arrested. The criminal histories of these defendants were generally less extensive: more than 70% had been previously arrested fewer than 5 times.
“(The Whiteaker) is Eugene’s favorite scapegoat,” said Audra McCabe, former resident of the Whiteaker who recently moved back to the neighborhood. McCabe had seen only one needle since her return and was not overly concerned.
The disillusioned demonstrator, who identified himself as a financial analyst, went on to scold Obama for capitulating to Wall Street bankers and global monetary interests.
Hemp proponents argue the plant contains little of the mind-altering chemical THC.
Cook the tagliatelli in a pan of boiling water until just cooked. Drain, leaving a little of the cooking water in the pan and set aside.
to my flowered silk dress
The air too soft, too green the sea.
PROJECT
Must go now, as I need to write a paragraph of two more for my current story before supper-time. What am I working on? What book have I got coming out? That's on my other blog, THE YEAR OF MOUSE.
Regret and remorse sink in
1) Ship Breaker, by Paolo Bacigalupi. Gritty, coastal novel set in a grim future where our protagonist scavenges broken ships for the useful bits still left on them. My review says: "Just a neat and satisfying package, all in one. Incredibly well written. Do yourself a favor and read it . . . slowly. This isn’t a book to be eaten in a night, though it could be done."
Along with that, investors are very focused on an antitrust lawsuit that could result in billions worth of penalties for Visa and MasterCard. While it seems that other competing companies, such as Citigroup and Bank of America are involved in the suit, the legal agreements between the banks and “payment networks” are by Visa’a admission complex which is critical to the company’s financial health.
Grands Pizzas and blueberries
Shi Tian Cai (Li Nan Xing) is one natural born gambler. Ever since his father passed away he decided to make a living by gambling to support his Family. He is married to Zhang Zhi Hui (Rebecca Lim), a devoted Christian who is pregnant and wants him to quit gambling before she conceives.
I received this terrific interview with Meg Gardiner, courtesy of Sleuthfest - and if you are not familiar with her work, after reading this you will want to be!
Collectors Edition
If you lost your sight tomorrow how would you express your creativity? Probably through music and dance. I enjoy both.
A ring of pink fire surrounded Christopher and I. It was huge. It was 15 feet tall.
For my card today I have used my favourite gorjuss girl and she is coloured with copics. The DP is from Papermania and I kept my layout quite simple to show off the pretty roses. I finished off with some ribbon and jewels from my stash.
Mrs. Grossman's Home Captions Stickers
And perhaps more tellingly, how often would people say this about the tasks we set for them?
So, you see, world, give Wifesy and I hater-ade and we’re going to make jokes about it. I say, bring it on because you can’t break our spirits. Oh, no, you can’t. Because we are the luckiest dogs in the world. The luckiest.
innocence glow
In this modern world most of us take energy for granted. It is something that has always been there for us to use. Only when there is a sudden interruption in the supply do we realize the degree of our dependence on energy. A failure of the domestic electricity supply or a sudden shortage of motor fuel is a major crises for most in the Western world.
Nowhere in the message did it say how long the test lasted. I couldn't zero out.
It doesn’t matter who I used to be
The pushing of this scheme by the Socialist-Communist-Green-Muslim alliance in Europe, and by their socialist allies in the United States like Al Gore, President Obama and his senior apparatchiks like global ecofascism advocate John Holdren and Marxist Afro-militant Van Jones, gives a clue. The fact that the same “Green” factions that parade their concerns for Nature, overdevelopment and overpopulation are also the promoters of the inundation of the same strained environment by unceasing streams of Thirdworlders, gives a clue.
For the first three hundred or so years of Christianity’s existence, many of the believers were persecuted for their beliefs. Christians were thrown to the lions, crucified and jailed simply for being a Christian. False teachers sought to undermine the work of true Christian teachers and so mislead others from the faith.
I guess the metal-mix, simple designs and rustyness calls for it all to be worn at the same time.. I'm already on it.
One cause for a lack of funds for basic research from the end of the Reagan era until the beginning of Clinton’s era was the funneling of a tremendous amount of money to the Superconducting Super Collider. The Superconducting Super Collider, which was being built in Waxahachie, Texas was fumbled, and the years of effort of the consultants, engineers, and construction workers was all for nothing. A total of approximately $2 billion was spent on the project only to have it driven into the ground. Its main motivation for being cancelled was its price tag, but not because the government could not afford it. It was ended because it was one of the only physics experiments receiving funds at the time while the rest of the country’s research suffered (Lincoln). The hope for the Superconducting Super Collider was that outside investment would relieve the government’s woes about the costs of the project. But as it turned out, the Department of Energy and the National Science Foundation were the only ones to foot the bill.
Helen Pidd (helenpidd) twits today that she's back in London where she will find it tricky to report further on the trial. She redirects those who are interested to Lars Bevanger (lbevanger) and Trygve Sorvaag (trygvesorvaag). She also cites Chris Elliott's op-ed, Open door: The readers' editor on … the problems of tweeting the Anders Behring Breivik trial, which in turn provides a reporter's rationalizations about why reporting testimony directly from Breivik's trial is bad:A tweet goes straight from event to air – and stays there. It is a discrete package that may later form a strand of a larger, more complex, story, but which will, nevertheless, exist of itself, shorn of context.
ATAF celebrated its formation with a gala celebration in a plush lounge of the Willard Hotel in Washington, D.C.
In the mean time, how about a little inspiration...
You can use the selection tools to select certain areas of your document for editing. If you use a selection tool, only the area that’s selected will be affected by any changes you make. You can “feather” selections (specify a fuzzy radius for them) using the Feather field in the options bar.
Redknapp has done a brilliant job at Tottenham and deserves to be in the running, but is it right he is considered a foregone conclusion?
I am again reminded of Titus. Paul emphasized to his young pastor friend that as leaders we must always be seeking to live a disciplined life. That means we should be seeking God to purify us. I was really humbled today. My inability to do my job correctly meant that other people had to work twice as hard doing their job.
As fantastic and confident as I might feel, the camera (and everyone else, I presume) sees something different. In fact, people who have known me for only the past 5 years have no other template for Kirie. I’m just that same old chubby mom they see in town (I cringe as I type). I don’t know which is worse--to be only known as the chubby mom, or to be recognized by people from my long-ago life accompanied by a thought like “Hey, didn’t that girl used to be small and cute? What happened?”
It is essential that we be honest with ourselves. We must acknowledge the destructiveness of our sin. It is only when we are honest with ourselves that we can truly repent.
p178-9 “…’Arouse the Mind without its abiding anywhere.’ Thousands of words spoken directly by Buddhas and patriarchs add up to this one phrase. Mind is the True-nature of things, transcending all forms. The True-nature is the Way. The Way is Buddha. Buddha is Mind. Mind is not within or without or in between. It is not being or nothingness or non-being or non-nothingness or Buddha or mind or matter. So it is called the abodeless Mind. The Mind sees colors with the eyes, hears sounds with the ears. Look for this master directly!”
I know to some of you this is on par with watching Jersey Shore and dressing our kids in “I Want to Grow up to Be a Kardashian” t-shits. I understand. I am acutely aware of the corporate monster behind the mouse and as well as the bread and circuses aspects of visiting a fantasy-land like WDW. I’m right there with you.
There is this great line in Superior Donuts. Actually, it's my favorite line. Arthur (the old hippie) is talking to Luther (who has had Franco's fingers cut off because Franco owed him $16,000):
Soda stream (get bizzy with the fizzy)
Bloom wherever you are planted by peacelovefabulous
I wandered lonely as a turd
Another place to start would be with Jesus. I think the church should be known as a place where Jesus is exalted and glorified and honored and obeyed. Yes, obeyed. You see the Bible says that Jesus is the head of the church. That means, in part, that he is in charge. He sets the standard. He makes the rules. He governs the church. He determines the church’s path and direction. (Colossians 1; 1 Corinthians 12)
To hear and see pictures of a child who learned to stand up with the help of a walker but who is now a mischievous child who runs through the corridors, telling stories and relating bits of news is nothing short of inspiring and hopeful. It takes a village to raise a child but it also takes resources and the hard work of good people.
1 tsp. ground coriander
The declaration has been signed by 48 European Members of Parliament from 19 different member states and 7 political groups: Socialists, Liberals, Christian Democrats, Independents, the Eurosceptics of the EFD and the ECR, and even a member of the Communist group. “This shows that the horrendous ‘farm attacks’ are of great concern to several political groups across Europe”, Philip Claeys MEP concluded.
I think I like the first one the best. I just need to actually commit to something and get the job done! Is paisley too busy? Is something less bold a better idea? Should I just paint them? Do you have any other thoughts?
Barry Schwartz – The Paradox of Choice
My grand mother helped me a lot at succeeding in my homeworks and I became head of the class which at the end of the grade got me an invitation to attend a music primary school named :Ecole Le Plateau.
Who are we who support the World Courts of Women on Poverty in the U.S.?
Nightmare takes the familiar route of deranged killer George Tatum being released from a mental institution in hopes that the doctors have cured him. Of course they haven't and George proceeds on a national tour of slaughters to reach one family in particular. What was particularly interesting in seeing this last night (I got spoiled by seeing this at Rue Morgue's Cinemacabre Night on 35 mm print with a sizable audience) was the complete lack of irony in Nightmare. After a week of happily thinking and talking about The Cabin In The Woods, it was great to get back to a tried and true slasher that had none of the gloss of even a Friday the 13th and to me felt much more like Texas Chainsaw Massacre. With all this talk of meta this and post modern that, it was hugely enjoyable to see a movie that is blood and guts but genuinely trying to make a point and examine the recesses of human depravity. Some times successfully, sometimes ... not.
The Sadness was silent now. Her crying at first was weak, then it became stronger and finally it was very desperate.
I hope our friendship will last the test of time, but I can’t help but think one day, she will really, really, really cross the line.
Well, what I mean they are ready for you to upgrade your “Powered by WordPress” website.
Bottom line: Its only flaw is leaving you wanting more of the same. Leviathan is a magnificent adventure set in a brilliantly executed steampunk World War I, with a dashing good male lead and the best underage and undercover lady soldier I’ve ever encountered in fiction.
You definitely won't get a standard martini or Manhattan here. What makes this bar stand out is the one-on-one interaction. Mikael is clearly enthusiastic about his work and takes pride in creating something unique for the clientele. In response to a few questions about Combier, he brought it out with a bottle of Cointreau alongside for us to taste the difference. David even scored a little bottle of Cointreau Cuisine to take home for a bit of cooking fun. We also got to sample a few of the sweets. Fortunately, the bar is quiet enough to allow for this kind of more personal dialogue with the customer. Although, as I've mentioned before, I do think that bars with no menus should have some indication of pricing, so customers have an idea of what they're in for. In this case, you're in for about 15 Euros a cocktail.
Hope: to desire with expectation of obtainment, to expect with confidence, a desire accompanied by expectation of or belief in fulfillment
Those words bounced off of me at the time, because I was in no condition to hear them. But now, almost twenty years later, I can still see the hurt in his eyes that day. I can still hear the disappointment in his voice that day. I can still hear those words over and over in my mind. He had put me up on the highest pedestal, and I let him down. I let him down in a very big way. And the worst part? I didn't even know it. I was so wrapped up in myself that I had no idea how much I was hurting my baby brother.
Because I know Spoil is a well-written, well-proofed and well-formatted book, I was not afraid to open it up for wider consumption in hopes of more reviews.
And then rake it.
By now we were very close to Solent CTA-4 (2,500′-5,500′) and had to make serious steps to the west…
There’s a mow, low feeling around me
When they ate steak and potatoes, I had meatloaf and potatoes.
If you’re a robot reading this in the future to search for possibly dangerous opinions being released onto the internet, know this: I don’t imagine myself for one second smart, clever, or brave enough to go against anything that is enforced by you or the people who control you. So I’m not going to try to start an uprising. In fact, if you are reading this in a world that does look similar to the one in Gattaca, Minority Report, or I, Robot, there’s a pretty good chance that I’ve already escaped to the wilderness to live off the land so I don’t have to participate in a society that has persuaded me to be comfortable with the idea of playing God (or obeying robots, either one). Of course, I’m also probably dead, since I don’t know how to live off the land. So seriously, I’m not a threat.
As parents, we must always strike a balance between understanding possible causes of our children’s rage, while taking care not to enter into power struggles or do things to harm or shame the child. This is incredibly difficult, as children are highly skilled at being able to identify and push our buttons! It is inevitable that children will make us angry.
She had a tag and it looked like we might be able to track down her owner, but that turned out to be a dead end.
7. Renegrenades
Two years after its release, Amenábar's movie Agora is continuing to perpetuate some modern myths about the history of science. The latest person to swallow its fable-version of history is a geologist called Donald Prothero, who is one of a number of bloggers at Skepticblog and who has written a glowing review of the film entitled "Hypatia, Agora and Religion vs Science". Prothero is Professor of Geology at Occidental College in Los Angeles and, judging from his posts, someone who has been keeping up the fight against the irrational idiots of the "Creation Science" movement and its latest stalking horse, the "Intelligent Design" political lobby. For that he deserves both our thanks and our pity. Unfortunately, probably as a consequence, he has bought the "Conflict Thesis" idea wholesale and so is happy to find it being reinforced by the version of history found in Agora. Of course, it's probably not entirely fair to expect a geologist to have much of a grasp of Late Roman history or to be up on the early history of science. But he seems to be taken as an authority on these matters by the readers of Skepticblog, judging from the readers' comments. Which is a worry, because, despite referring to "scholarly sources" that he consulted when writing his review, he makes a complete hash of the history behind this story.
This weekend, on a rainy Saturday morning, I'm thanking God over here.
Once again the paparazzi have caught you at the airport. This time you were flying from LA to Vancouver to do some last minute Breaking Dawn Part 2 re-shoots (exciting!!). You were dressed in your Airport Uniform: skinny jeans, sneakers, sunglasses, T-shirt and hoodie. You were minding your own business, trying to avoid crowds and trying to look generally inconspicuous.
Remember when I said Ilsa: The Wicked Warden was all about this woman trying to find her missing sister? Yeah, well, it's not about that at all. Okay, maybe it is about that (how the fuck should what things are about). But in my mind, what the film really about is one woman's epic struggle to obtain a clean culo. And besides Greta, who do you think is the one woman at Clinica Las Palomas in a position to demand a pristine culo? Why, it's 10, of course. And who do you suppose she wants to be her primary culo cleaner? You guessed it, she wants 41. Walking up to 41 in the shower, 10 tells her, "you turn me on," and instructs her to wash her back and to scrub her culo. As I watched the suds slowly trickle down the sharply defined contours of her sturdy back, I couldn't help but notice that her culo wasn't being scrubbed at all. An increasingly frustrated 10 catches wind of this as well and yells, "I told you to scrub my culo!"
So, if you hear me shout "Oh, crayons!", you'll know what I really mean.
Not all of the past two weeks have been hard. I did do some felting...though the piece is dragging on much longer than usual. But the best thing I did art-wise was to do some dyeing and felting with my wonderful nieces. These little girls always bring me joy and when we are doing these projects I feel good about myself.
Derwent Press presents what they do extremely well and concisely. The product of their services—the author’s books—are given large prominence on their website. Authors interested in Derwent Press would be advised to firstly follow their own offered advice.
The storm apparently terminated just North of El Paso, TX (no screenshot) but you can look this up directly to verify..
This feeling of improbability of war ever coming to fruition was shared by most Sarajevans. We lived in a cosmopolitan city, city of art, culture, computers, and microwaves. Surely, wars only happen to those who are not in control of their national destiny. Wars happened to OTHERS! Furthermore, just a weekend before all the happenings, we were talking about changing the place we usually went out. We were planning to try out a place behind the Art Academy since the art crowd was familiar to us, the art high school students.
I like the view of various pages and embellishments that peeks through when you are looking at a different page. Here, the little heart from the picture of James reading to Sammy shows up after two more pages are turned.
Before I begin my post on what are the best of the short stories of Elizabeth Bowen (1899 to 1973-Ireland)I want to invite everyone to consider participating in Irish Short Stories Week. From March 14 to March 20 (March 17 is St Patrick's Day) I will be posting every day on at least one short story by an Irish author. I hope others may join in by posting on an Irish short story that week and leaving a comment on my blog about their post. I will create a master post and link up to everyone. I am hoping there will be posts on Irish female authors as it is a very male dominated genre. Most of the stories I will personally post on will be stories in the public domain that can be read online. This gives others the opportunity to read along if they wish. I am working on prizes by authors of books set in Ireland but nothing concrete yet. The real prize is the chance to sample world class authors like James Joyce and Samuel Beckett (he wrote some short stories in his early years), read some horror stories by Bram Stoker (the author of Dracula), or the wonderful short stories of Oscar Wilde. This just gets you started. I will post more reading ideas soon. To be part of what I hope will be an annual Reading Life event all you have to do is read and post on one short story. Lots and lots of online options-you do not need to go to the library or buy a book.
Ms. Hammond does a great job of sucking you right into the story with her fast-paced narrative. When Cara wakes up, her entire family is dead...And she is, too. It appears that Cara didn't die of natural causes. Love Sucks is packed full of love and adventure seen through the wide eyes of Cara Jones, a newly made vampire. Told through Cara's point of view, we see her awakening and coming to terms with death as she knows it.
our nods we agitated love alive.
I admire her strength
So I think for the immediate future...I am going to just take my time and play! I want to experiment more with paint and ink and stamping and texture...lol....and colour and chipboard and canvas.....
The pair – who may be unlikely to find much common ground – will be joined by philosopher Sir Anthony Kenny at the event at Oxford University.
It’s a light-hearted little tale and it was great fun to write. The very worst that happens is that a tray of muffins gets over-cooked. But underneath it all, there’s fire.
release date: October 27, 1988 (Netherlands), January 25, 1991 (USA) and September 18, 2001 (Criterion Collection)
much, but it never seemed like we were in lack of anything. Because
Today was my fourth class back. There was a few days lapse between class 3 and 4 mostly due to me savoring this 10 class card. I didn't want to use it up too quickly. That's not an issue anymore because today after class I bought three months of yoga. So I'm officially back as a member who can do unlimited yoga again. I went to 1pm with George. He had a Halloween mask on for the first few minutes of teaching then said "forget it, it's too hot!" Dray had taught the 11am and boy oh boy was the room toasty! I had to really focus on my breath. My class went OK with the same issues I had the first three classes, with the exception of camel. I can get into camel, both sets and hold it already. Making progress feels good! Now to work on fixed firm. I really cannot even get my butt down, much less begin to lay back. It's quite baffling, as I used to ease right into the full expression of that posture and just kind of "hang out". Now it's just complete agony. It will just take more yoga. Alot more yoga.
So...we're not lawyers, but we do have an IP/Copyright attorney who once specialized in prosecuting scammers in his former life, looking over our shoulder. "Jaws" keeps us pretty well aware of the law and how it applies to the scammers we deal with.
"If it doesn't blow a protected circuit or fuse, then you're going to have a fire in your car," Boyd said.
i received 'a knitter's home companion' as a gift from a dear friend. i intended to savor it, keep it in my knitting basket, taking it out here and there for inspiration. instead i read it in two days time. it is charming and i loved it, and i think it's going to stay in my basket as much for the patterns and recipes, as for the friendship it came with. you can find the book here.
Pandaren history stretches back thousands of years. The pandaren once labored under a race of ancient warlords known as the Mogu. The pandaren eventually staged a successful revolution that deposed the Mogu and established a pandaren empire that would prosper for thousands of years.
As you can probably imagine, in recent weeks I’ve been turning quite a lot to some of these pieces of evergreen entertainment to bring me some comfort. Of course, some of them have memories attached to them. But many of the memories attached to them are even older than those ones that are painful. They’ve been the constant presence in my life, and that brings me comfort.
Within a day, he had deleted me off his facebook friends and wouldn't respond to any of my texts asking if he was alive. I only texted him a couple of times, because I'll be damned if I turn into one of those chicks who lets the dude know he got to her. So. WTF happened?? I still don't know. I was talking to a different guy for a week or so a few months after the R.J. incident, and the exact same thing happened, he just stopped calling and texting, and dropped off the face of the earth. It has got to be something I'm doing, but I have no idea what it is. My girlfriends that I've shared these stories with are as puzzled as I am.
Peter Schiff: There are lots of advantages. It is real money, it has intrinsic value, and the government can’t print it. And the gold standard is much better than fiat money.
Joy, happiness and laughter
Romney's campaign doesn't foresee the 43rd president playing a substantive role in the race. Aides are carefully weighing how much the former president should be involved in the GOP convention—and for good reason. The Bush fatigue that was a drag on GOP nominee John McCain four years ago, and on the country, still lingers, including among Republicans.
counting down the days till I can quit working, mostly because I have
The action went slack as we drove through the drier sections of the ranch – though still saw plenty of deer and turkey. We eventually meandered to a section of the property known as the Railroad Grade where we could see down and out across swampier portions of property. And I know it’s starting to sound like a fish story now, but we did indeed locate another herd of hogs.
Brasserie d'Achouffe Houblon Chouffe Dobbelen IPA Tripel
Malika Zarrar: Whose ruling was this?
5) Relocation and work possibilities. With a second citizenship, you’ll always have the right to live and work in another country. Imagine, for example, having a European passport, entitling you to work anywhere in the EU. If you’re living in the US or Canada now, that could potentially open up an entire new line of lucrative opportunities to pursue.
Meanwhile, attention is turning away from the self-incrimination evident throughout both of Arse Rim Pong’s narcissistic ‘books’, and towards the Grime Parson’s Facebook page. Most hacks are increasingly of the opinion that it’s much quicker and easier to simply go to the site, trawl through his ‘mates’, and then ask them if the lovely Piers ever listened in on their messages.
The ever-industrious French producer (and movie director!) Mr. Oizo is back with his pal Flat Eric, this time with a bright, summery, dare I say "fun" EP entitled Stade 3. Crisp, rolling clubhouse tunes for only the finest of professional actors, sashimi chefs, golfers and their expert caddies. Naturally such a refined album can only be purchased by the elite as it's going for the super high price of... oh. It's free. Neat.
(크림소스 떡볶이, cream sauce ddukppoki)
Here's your wiener!
$0.40 off Betty Crocker Cookie Mix
And as a sidenote, if you have a little one who isn't quite ready to swim without a little help from a floatation device, I HIGHLY recommend a "Puddle Jumper" like Ellie is wearing. It is really awesome (and no, they didn't pay me to say that!) :)
* Add the sugar, ground almonds, and vanilla bean seeds. Mix until combined.
(TCM is showing Muscloe Beach Party tonight at 10:00 EDT as part of its "Spring Break Week.")
Per la buona riuscita di un giardino non occorre molto
But my parents said, “Its ok son, you will learn to grow, mature and be independent and Mom and Dad will support you as much as we can give.”
8. Iron Man
We've already made some mini Crunch Bar mummies this year for the reading class....
TASTINGS
THERE are more than 30,000 items for sale at each 2MBS FM 102.5 Book and CD Fair, including books, CDs, DVDs and sheet music. The fairs have now been running for 30 years, with high-quality items donated by listeners of the radio station. Prices are reasonable, usually 70% less than a new book or CD.
The CBOE equity only put call ratio reflects the shift towards calls as traders attempt to take advantage of the bounce higher. The 10 day moving average has fallen to 0.64 from its recent high of 0.89 on June 17th. The normalized put call ratio has also collapsed utterly:
Thank you for continuing to subscribe to 512 Kidz blog. I am on hiatus for the time being. I will continue to update and maintain 512 Kidz blog until I have more time for blogging at a later date.
Than I bought this satin knee-hight socks. They are really amazing! I can't wait for spring to try them out. They are non-transparent until you wear them as over-knee high socks, then the blue become a little greenish, still, the print is amazing.
It doesn’t mean that you won’t need to put the work in but that you should follow your natural writing instinct. If you have a sudden strong desire to write a story then follow it! If you have never done any writing before then you will have to try to learn to follow your writing instinct. I call it an urge or an itch. Sometimes it creeps up on you and you just have an intense urge to write something. Other times it disappears for ages and you miss it like crazy.
♥ taylor swift kenny chesney miley cyrus
We are doing only what all the worldly can do.
That's exactly what we're hoping for as this would be the ultimate in rock'n'roll theatre. Seriously, we do believe in taking things to the edge physically on stage, playing music as a sort of catharsis. A gig should be hard and take you to the edge if it's going to have any meaning. We played a gig at a spinning-aerobics class the other day and we actually sweated more than the audience. That's the way it should be. Our concerts should always be more painful to us than it is for the audience.
Finish Papel Picado - about half done
From the stately mansions of Carnegie Hill, to the cobblestone streets of Little Italy, over the perilous cliffs of northern Italy, to the white-capped lakes of northern Minnesota, these star-crossed lovers meet and separate, until, finally, the power of their love changes both of their lives forever.
Richard McGuire has only a small body of work within comics, mostly limited to a few short stories (including the seminal "Here" from Raw) and his experiments with E.C. Segar's Popeye character. Collected in two French volumes, McGuire's Popeye drawings are abstract representations of the famous sailorman and his beanpole-thin girlfriend Olive Oyl. It's a demonstration of the inherent power of cartoon iconography: strip these familiar characters down to stylized outlines in a single primary color (either red or blue) and they're still recognizable, still resonant. On page after page, McGuire delineates Popeye and Olive with blobs and pipes shaped to suggest their cartoon figures. There's no narrative, just endless transformations and variations, McGuire riffing on these basic forms, demonstrating the variety of ways in which he can explore the same visuals, and the massive warping that Popeye can withstand while remaining recognizable and iconic. Popeye and Olive is the original collector's edition book, massively expensive and long unavailable (but excerpted in Dan Nadel's great anthology The Ganzfeld), while P+O is a sequel in which McGuire's improvisations take on a distinctly sexual nature, positioning his heroes within abstract narratives of desire and lust, like geometric porn.
So what does all this mean? I’m asking myself as much as I am asking you the reader. That whole period of my life left a very deep impression on me, and I have looked at humanity differently ever since, but I’ve never really tried to sum it up in a concise “these are the truths I learned” type of synopsis. I’m just thinking out loud here.
I usually confine it to email and make it a quick note – thank them again for the interview and ask if there’s been an update/any movement on the position. If they respond, you can usually get a feel for whether you’re annoying the shit out of them.
I'm up with the kids well into 2am, sometimes later. Answering questions, listening to them , helping them , feeding them, sometimes we watch a show we recorded.
Bake bread for about 10 minutes or until the edges are golden brown. In a separate bowl, mix meatballs & spaghetti sauce to coat (this is a perfect recipe for left over spaghetti and meatballs too). Remove the bread from the oven and spoon the meatball mixture into the dish on top of the bread. Return to oven and bake for 25-30 minutes or until thoroughly heated through in the center. Pull out at about 25 minutes and cover with the mozzarella cheese and baked it for another 5 minutes.
"She don't have time for his man". I think as long as she has time for her man, it's ok.
The house is a 501.3 (C) non profit organization, and the flat rate donation of $200 to participate in the Tour is tax deductible.
Broonmark +2 crit +10
Mostly a high standard this season, but I’m wondering how it could be stretched out further. I love this show, but if this is the end, that is also ok.
“For men and women are not only themselves; they are also the region in which they are born, the city apartment or farm in which they learnt to walk, the games they played as children, the old wives tales they overheard, the food they ate, the schools they attended, the sports they followed, the poets they read, and the God they believed in. It is all these things that have made them what they are, and these are the things that you can’t come to know by hearsay…”
Start your own Twelve Days of Christmas.
We have deliberately steered away from wasting billions of taxpayers money on a trial that excluded the patients that were supposed to be in the trial and which came to conclusions that were written before the trial had even started.
My guilt is gone the price is paid yet satan waves the bill
Next, Paul Williams vs Sergio Martinez. After searching for a pay day for the past 6 months, Williams took the rematch with Martinez which is what the fans want to see. Personally I thought he won the first fight and I think he'll win more convincingly this time around unless Paul Williams changes his game plan, which I personally have never seen before.
It meant that rather than being, as per the expressed intent, at the centre of the experience, I felt only subject to it. If I were really one of the performers, I could choose not to look or not to move or to do something else, but these weren't options. I thought about the imaginative projection that happens when you play an RPG video game; this wasn't anything like that, because what makes you invest in a game is the illusion of decision, however guided by the perameters of the game. My being there, aside from the brute fact of my physical presence, didn't make a whit of difference to what happened in And the Birds Fell from the Sky. I felt curiously cancelled out.
truth,
1 bristling
Ischemia can be life-threatening. Although there are alternative treatments for angina, traditional medical care may be necessary. Prevention of the cause of ischemia, primarily atherosclerosis, is primary. This becomes even more important for people with a family history of heart disease.
And that was it. With those few words, my world was changed. I was expecting to see my little baby squirming around, hear a beautiful, strong heartbeat, and possibly even be able to start figuring out a name for him or her. What happened instead was that my worst fears were confirmed, and I understood why I hadn’t felt enough movement, why I hadn’t been gaining quite as much weight as usual. I found out that my baby was dead.
Sometimes it's not that a book was bad. Sometimes it's not that a book wasn't original, or that I didn't click with the characters, or that the writing wasn't quite stellar enough. Sometimes it's not any of those things: sometimes it's just that I'm the wrong reader for a particular story, and I think that's exactly what happened with Sweet Venom.
One day, I got tired of just sitting and watching Jeffery be cool. I wanted to be cool too. I wanted Jeffery to teach me how to ride his bike. It looked easy enough.
Nolan and Emily find out that Tyler isn’t who appears to be. Emily finds out a little bit more and sees that Nolan has been paying a little extra for some sex business from Tyler. She is not pleased.
PROS: more grumpy than anyone who's played Scrooge before, yells at kids quite convincingly, hoards coal like no other
He also doesn't get to see it beforehand, it is part of the mystery.
He doesn't want to patch something that's broken,
This so-called “Real” Tiny would just be… a shrunken furry. But to me, that’s not what a Tiny is. Heck, that’s a micro. Shrunken smaller than Tinies, but with all the limbs and torso joints intact. They can use all the standard animations of normal avatars. Tinies can’t.
Matilainen P, Juutilainen J, Saarikoski S, Läära E, Suonio S. Early pregnancy loss and exposure to 50-Hz magnetic fields. Kuopio (Finland). In: Proceedings of the URSI/IEEE XVI National Convention on Radio Science, 1990.
“It became a game. I would cut her or bite her so hard she would bleed. I am addicted to a new form of drug. I am addicted to blood!”
How we just go with the flow
T: Yes, you are SO fart.
Now, I know most of my readers don't live in Austin and I'm sure you're totally bummed to be missing out on this. And I have to tell you that I'm bummed on your behalf. But if you do live in Austin, or if you'll be here for UT's graduation, or you might just be passing through for a few hours, or something, then come on down!!
Call waiting, call hold, call divert
I took this picture last week sometime after a Tone It Up video workout.
Looking back now, I applied every ounce of experience and ability to making the most effective poster I possibly could. I thought about who it was aimed at, what I wanted them to take out of it straight away, how I was going to catch their attention, how I was going to make them care, how to get them to act, what tools to give them to act. And how to do all of this in as pithy a way as possible, so a person going about their own business would get the message. And, just as importantly, I didn't employ any technique that would get in the way of the communication, or that would cloud the main point - only things that made the poster more effective.
After Junsu back (or he back to the time when Junsu still alive), he became more caring toward Junsu. He look at his organizer. The day of his presentation and Junsu’s accident.
GYST-Ink is an artist-run company providing information, technology and solutions created by artists for artists. Our mission is to support artists and arts organizations with an integrated mix of software, services and information in order to keep artists working. GYST–Ink is dedicated to empowering and educating artists so that they can develop sustainable and successful careers on their own terms.
Now, I wish to admit that I don’t like laughing at people. Generally speaking, laughing at people is admitting that one either thinks the person or the object of the persons jap is inferior to ones self – for the moment at least, and that’s not a good thing.
Bâri′, Barry, Barack: he was, he is, he will be.
Bronze Marstons Banks's Bitter 3.8
But even if Egyptian Nefertiti was that beautiful, remember Cleopatra was not Egyptian. She was a Macedonian Greek, a descendant of Ptolemy, one of Alexander the Great's commanders.
Most players who use skill systems think in terms of abilities adding a bonus to a skill roll, or a skill adding to an ability check, or maybe (as in GURPS) treating the skill as a stand-alone value, with ability scores only setting a default or base level (effectively the same as skill adding to ability.) In such a system, skills are theoretically infinitely improvable.
10-Phantoms-Josephine.mp3
Paul: Timothy, you never have and never will discover anything ‘on your own.’ You would know this if you had thought more deeply about what I said. What I said was: “Think over what I say, for the Lord will grant you understanding in everything.’ The Lord, Timothy, the Lord! ‘From him and through him and to him are all things. To him be the glory!’ (Romans 11:36). He is the ground and goal of thought. So think, Timothy. Gird up your mind and think!” (John Piper, A Godward Life, p. 122-123)
This sounds wonderful in Vedic Sanskrit in that poetic chanting. The chanting makes you feel that you have but to stretch a little and you can ‘experience’ the grandeur puruSa! He is within your reach.
One more thing: for the most part, Ezio and his nemesis are placed in the center of the screen which gives them a place of power. In scenes where Ezio is not in the center, you don't see his face, or only parts of him, and he's usually bigger onscreen than anybody else. All of these things are great devices to make a character feel powerful on screen.
No plans for the rest of the day, except reading and watching the RED Sox tonight. Have a great day yourself!
This no doubt explains his total incompetence and abject irrelevance, I note for someone who has already had 6 years on this fat cat gravy train his donations seem only relevant to buying his own status and in the last 12 months he has only asked 3 written questions and seems to have made about 5 minutes of speech a month!
I shared my personal reality. At home, my boys rarely sit through a meal. My 10-yr-old is prone to eating on his feet; he's still my Most Likely to Fall Off a Chair for No Apparent Reason. My 8-yr-old constantly rocks his chair and all of my boys are more than happy to leap up from the table to peer out the window. And often, I let it go. I reinforce proper behavior, but I know that expecting my four boys, ages 5 to 13, to eat every meal while seated properly is a bit beyond their current capabilities. So I tolerate a certain amount of physical movement during a meal. I know that my sons are quite capable of adapting their behavior to the situation (even at this age, they understand the difference between lunch at home and Christmas dinner at Grandma's), and that their behavior will change as they grow.
And so it began…The tradition of Clarence leaving a short note and some chocolate on the dining room table.
place all ingredients in jar and cover with vinegar--the more vinegar you add, the more diluted (and less spicy) they will be. Let them sit for about a week and you are ready to go!
In the past many people have told me that bluetooth connectivity has been too difficult or expensive to work with. In this article I want to make things as simple as possible, allowing you to just move forward with your ideas and projects. One very useful function is to control an Arduino-compatible board with an Android-based mobile phone that has Bluetooth connectivity. Using the BtB we can create a wireless serial text bridge between the phone and the Arduino, allowing control and data transmission between the two.
Stirring occasionally, bring the cream and ginger to a simmer in a heavy saucepan over low heat. Remove the pan from the heat and let it steep for about 15 minutes.
2012 IS OUR 83rd YEAR !!
1 absurd
Moldau, Prokofiev Lieutenant Kije Suite, Nicolai Overture to Merry Wives of
Glad to see all these upstanding folks able to work so well together, too bad that Rezko doesn’t want to serve time, and holds quite a bit of information about the Chicago Political Establishment that may be interesting to the Feds.
2 large red peppers cut into bite-sized chunks
And my brother? Well, after finishing his degree, he did a law conversion course…
That brings us to the last card of the five I have for you this morning, made for the HYCCT challenge to make a card with lots of girlie embellishments. This was also a challenge for me - I would rather make a masculine card than make one with lots of foofy embellishments any day - but I stretched myself for the challenge and came up with this one using My Favorite Things' Flopsey Flowers and MFT's Gettin' Sketchy Week 44 sketch (I substituted Flopsey in for the oval), some papers from the DCWV's Flower stack, lace, velvet ribbon and prima flowers with rhinestone centers:
Google Drive launches today as a revamped version of Google Docs, with greatly improved storage and accompanying software. Google has had a serious case of amateur hour while trying to keep this product a secret, but now people can stop speculating and start seeing if this is something they want to use.
06-08 Stockholm, Sweden – Annexet
A 2007 study published by University of Chicago law professor Thomas J. Miles and Cass R. Sunstein… used a different measurement of judicial activism: the tendency of judges to strike down decisions by federal regulatory agencies. Sunstein and Miles found that by this definition, the Supreme Court’s “conservative” justices were the most likely to engage in “judicial activism” while the “liberal” justices were most likely to exercise “judicial restraint.”
9. Assassins - 2004 Broadway Revival
“I erm, I am Bernie Crumbs. The clubs accountant”
On October 4, 2001, Siberia Airlines Flight 1812 crashed over the Black Sea. The plane was en route from Tel Aviv, Israel, to Novosibirsk, Russia, and all 78 people aboard were killed. The crash was initially thought to be a terrorist attack, since an Armenian plane near the scene reported seeing the Russian plane explode before it crashed into the sea. However, American intelligence reported that the crash was due to an errant S-200 surface to air missile fired as part of a Ukrainian Air Defense Forces exercise. Many people have labeled this hypothesis unlikely, considering the missiles range and safety features, claiming that the US was in fear of mass hysteria with yet another terrorist attack in the weeks following September 11. Ultimately, the government of Ukraine officially recognized their military’s fault in the accident and started negotiating compensation payments for victims’ relatives.
In the last tutorial, we learned how to create your own custom characters, including choosing what Class they were and what equipment they started with. At the time we left it at just the basic Starting equipment, pre-made items that came with RMVX when we bought it.
Aśvatthāmā, Droṇa’s son, is the same vile man who decapitated the five sleeping sons of the Pāṇḍavas and then recklessly let loose an uncontrolled nuclear-like explosion in a last-ditch attempt to save his own skin. The Pāṇḍava’s spared his life and let him go with a mere reprimand. His contemptible spirit did not reform, however. He brooded constantly on how to destroy the royal family who had defeated and humiliated him.
“What’s going on?” she asked.
The controversy began after Limbaugh called Fluke a “slut” and a “prostitute” after she advocated for expanded access to birth prevention. In the wake of those comments, Limbaugh has been blasted from nearly all quarters, including by Republican House Speaker John Boehner, and has shed a string of high-profile advertisers, including AOL.
it is the present that it bears away
2/ Record funds (1.9 million) in the kitty to fight an election.
February 12, 2012 (Sunday) 7:30 PM
I started out with an ATS Gear MOLLE war-belt in coyote brown (for whatever reason, mostly because I live in the desert, all of my LBE in coyote brown). I tried ruck it buckle-in-the-back, like the old RACK (Ranger Assault Carrying Kit) set-up, but it really just didn't work for me, so I went back to buckling it in the front and have had no issues with it.
However, he owes it to his status to behave as a prominent citizen so every Easter he takes part in the re.enactment of the Passion which passes through the streets of the town on Good Friday.
Today, I helped a friend look for apartments, and ended up stumbling into the home of the two singers from the band Prince Rama.
24. Albert Einstein never wore any socks.
On another note, today is the last day to enter my giveaway for a CSN gift certificate. To enter, go here and leave a comment. You can blog, post to Facebook or Tweet about the give away for extra entries. Winner announced Saturday morning!
Paper - Bo Bunny, PTI White, Wild Wasabi Cardstock
I haven't been making cards all that long. Actually, it's two years this month. I'm not sure what got me started. I've always loved to create and craft and I was just cruising the internet and kept seeing lovely cards using rubber stamps and Sizzix cuts and knew I could have fun doing this. Of course my cards from 2 years ago, consisting of a layer or two of paper and mediocre pencil coloring, are a lot different from my cards of today with multiple layers of cardstock on the front and both inside surfaces, stitching, colored with Copics, cricut cut embellishments, etc. My initial interest in it has snowballed into an obsession!
He dislikes the idea of books which are issue driven. Books should be a good story; they should entertain, rather than focus on an issue or a message. Messages, in particular, are patronizing to teen readers. But if one can write a novel from which a reader comes away with something powerful and that has left them thinking, then a book had done its job.
3) A Sikh must take Amrit, wake up at Amrit Vela, meditate upon Naam and read Bani.
Evan: "Me too!"
Due to the fact that I work shifts quite often the weekend glee will pass me by. However, after a particularly rough week at work I actually have a full weekend off. I don’t have to be in work until Monday afternoon, and other than tidying my room a bit, I plan to have a full weekend of relaxation and “me” time, which includes:
The petrol engine connected with Dzire delivers a fuel economy of approximately 14 kmpl in area and about 17 kmpl for highways whereas your current diesel versions offers effectiveness of about 18 kmpl in town and about 19 kmpl on motorways.
"Good plan.," Says Ted, "Right Everyone hold hands and say-"
Mom never took music lessons, but she loved music. She played guitar and piano by ear and could probably have played other instruments as well if she’d had access to them. I loved sitting in front of her and watching her hands on the frets and strings or sitting beside her and watching her hands on the keyboard. When I started playing the piano, I think she enjoyed watching my hands, too. She wasn’t a touchy-feely kind of mom, but one Sunday morning she was holding my hand during church. She laid my hand out flat on her lap and traced my fingers with hers.
Don’t think. Just maneuver toward the cameras. Dodge the celebrities and reporters, I told myself. Don’t stop!
The wait is turning tedious and draining.
changing like quicksilver
Human life –and by extension all Life– is the greatest wealth of the new Modern Freedom paradigm, and must never again be taken lightly. Even the vilest of criminals, monsters who have proven beyond all doubt that they are unfit to share the gift of life, must be tried with every guarantee available and extreme transparency to ensure that we understand exactly why there was no other choice, and can explain it to our children so that they never forget.
Here’s another cosmic irony. Just a few hours ago, I met a kid who has been diagnosed of brain cancer. He was an honor student in elementary. He could have been the valedictorian next year if his brain tumor didn’t just pop out of the blue and he had to stop studying to fight it. His favorite subject is math. His math teacher (when he was diagnosed with cancer) is my father.
Happy 4th of July Everyone! I'll be spending my Independence day working on drapes. They are looking pretty sweet!
Instead of studying all night in the library, try taking a book to Sweetheart Circle. Take a few minutes to enjoy the fresh air under the shade of a tree instead of sitting in front of a computer all day.
That’s just one instance of how things work better in the book version than the movie version for this particular story.
Nothing is transparent, it is all cloudy.
7. Love, love, love to shop but hate to spend money.
An apology should not be followed by the word "but". If you are sincerely apologizing, why do you have to defend it? If you are sincerely apologizing, why do you have to follow it with an excuse? If you are sincerely apologizing, you would just say "I'm sorry". period. nothing else to say. end of story.
I would like to claim that I am not unintelligent. I have a very varied vocabulary, and many big complicated words to express myself with. I still curse a lot. This is because curse words already have a certain amount of aggression associated with them, in a way that few big, complicated words do. Sometimes, you don't want to express your feelings perfectly. Sometimes, you're just in a heated discussion or really angry about something and you want to express this like a normal fucking person. No need to write poems about it. I personally loathe people who constantly try to show everybody how bloody clever they are, constantly use the most intellectual-sounding words they can manage, never relax and then look down on everybody who does not act exactly the same way.
There are many questions everyday that challenge us. There are answers that we would prefer not to give. Let’s shed that approach and as the seasons change may we also change. May we be an open fountain flowing with knowledge, kindness and truth.
Delivered Problem Analysis Speech on troubles associated with childhood cancer
Gross Pointe Blank
I certainly didn’t consider the matter closed. My name, image and brief details of my life had been used to fabricate a story which bore no resemblance to me or my life, then presented as fact, said by me, in my own words. It was damaging to me, my children, my friends and had a significantly negative impact on my life.
"Hold Me Now" by Thompson Twins
- Krakow was the capital of Poland for over 500 years
Weniger Einfluss der US-Regierung auf die Internetverwaltung Icann — das hatte nicht nur die EU-Kommission gefordert. Auch Länder wie Brasilien und Iran zeigten sich immer wieder verärgert über die Vormachtstellung der USA in Sachen Internet. Die Internetverwaltung Icann durfte nicht völlig autonom entscheiden — das US-Handelsministerium hatte stets seine Hände mit im Spiel, wenn es um Grundsatzentscheidungen wie neue Topleveldomains ging.
So what about you? Do you have a dream you and your husband have been talking about forever? Do it!
“Cucumber”
May God’s grace be with me always! Amen!
The head command writes the first ten lines of a file to the screen.
* Children and Young People’s Participation Rights in Education, Anne B. Smith (2006) University of Otago at Dunedin, NZ.
On the road to Pittsburgh for 9/16.
For the filling: 2 cups shredded coconut, 1&1/2 cups sugar (adjust according to sweetness of sugar), 2 tsp rice flour, 1 tsp crushed cardamom, 1/4 tsp saffron (optional) or few drops of rose essence (optional).
ribbon which tether back to birth.
Roy: When you pay off the goalie every month, who gets the money?
All these are signs of occult or strange spiritual attitudes, which produce what nowadays cannot be called anything but miracles, i.e. something which does not accord with the normal way of natural processes. This is just what is needed to prepare the world for the acceptance of Antichrist, who will come with a great deception, with demonic wonders and miracles in order to deceive people.
3. One Flew Over the Cuckoo’s Nest (Jack Nicholson) Watched this again recently and was awed by it.
at her home for about an hour. Oddly, the friend didn’t spend much time with us,
We praise Him with respect to the following: that the Father foreshows to His sons, still dwelling in this life that is subject to misery, many gifts of inner consolation.
Cannibal Corpse guitarist Pat O’Brien will fill in for Exodus’ Gary Holt when Holt leaves the Slayer European tour to play with his own band Exodus at the Estadio Nacional in Santiago, Chile on April 4. Holt has been filling in for Slayer guitarist Jeff Hanneman since the tour kicked off February 26 in Australia.
He typed it a second time and then rose so suddenly, the old woman stepped back out of his way.
All in all it was a very enjoyable day and I wish I could see these guys all the time. They’re the best friends one can have!♥
As I fiddled with the phone's touch screen, The Long Man looked on impassively. He'd seen it all: Roman centurions, Saxon thanes, medieval pilgrims, Victorian farmers and, today, people in garish fleeces walking their oversexed dogs along public footpaths.
These tights from LeeZu are definitely unusual and will add some glamour to any outfit. Lightly patterned with dots and faintly curved lines, the material cuts away from the upper leg, filled in by some loose chains that run below the knees. They join again to form the sock parts, neatly finishing the look.
Sylvia was 10 when I posted Kids and Communication, and imagined what life would be like raising a teenager. Re-reading it now is like looking back at myself as a teenager and thinking, "ah, if I knew then..."
There is a quote from Ivan Illich that says:
I suppose this concept is possible in a metaphysical sense, and I also suppose it's conceivable to patent such things from a section 101 standpoint (although I have serious reservations - I'm not seeing the "concrete, tangible result" here). But how on earth would you claim such things to get around all the 112 issues. While the site claims that terms like "trusts", "believes", "desires" and "futile" are not ambiguous, I can't see how one can take such a position. Since you're claiming from the vantage point of the character, who would be "a person having ordinary skill in the art" for making such an interpretation - the character or the author? If my storyline has the character "suspecting" instead of "believing", do I escape infringement? Is it an equivalent? How do I determine if a claim element is enabled? How would means-plus-function be interpreted in such situations?
Sylvia
But assuming you have a handy MIC on the spot it really is no drama. Well hardly no drama. Think 45 minutes of bang, push, shove, bang, swear ... and one missing dowel.
Contact your school if the cyberbullying is occurring through your school district’s Internet system. School administrators have an obligation to intervene in such cases, even if the bullying is occurring off school grounds. Make your school administrators aware of the problem. They may be able to help resolve the problem and watch out for face-to-face bullying.
The instructions call for cutting 3/4" wide strips of a magazine page:
The story on its own is good but on predictable lines. James Bond comes across Auric Goldfinger who is the main villain in this book and catches him playing dirty in a game of cards. Slowly, he figures out that this person is not a small time crook but a big criminal with backing of international group of terrorists and smugglers. The climax is really interesting with this villain planning a biggest robbery of tons of gold and how James Bond is able to destroy his plans and in the end destroys the man himself.
Psh.
Without further ado, I hereby gratefully accept my “Versatile Blogger Award”.
But you know, it's second hand and we didn't have to pay a damn thing for it. Which is awesome.
Maybe one day, I'll revisit these and fix inconsistencies and work on a story book . . . my dad, the ultimate storyteller, would expect nothing less. Right now, I'll just continue to fight through all the crap that comes with losing your dad - and watching your mom hurt - and holding your kids as they cry.
We are using a different surgeon this time. We switched to Kaiser this year and so far we have been very happy with them. Eli seems to like his new surgeon. He never did like his old surgeon. He was a very hyper doctor; I think it was too much for Eli.
Name: Sophia
The overall wearing experience was great! No discomfort at all, after wearing them for long day like 10 hours or slightly more. The lens are slightly thicker than my usual daily wear contact lens. They are easy to remove for wash. I accidentally stained them with my eyeliner and it was easier remove after some rubbing using the solution.
the time is now.
I doused the cake with a bit of a chocolate ganache and then let it cool. Then added part of the frosting and sandwiched the two cakes together.
Add the tomatoes (undrained) to the pan, and add the raisins, cumin, coriander, and ancho chile powder. Simmer uncovered over medium heat, stirring occasionally, for about 10 minutes. Add salt and pepper to taste.
Today's card is mainly for the house mouse challenge blog. These mice were among the first stamps I fell inlove with, but they were sooo expensive to get here in Sweden. I remember getting my first internet order from the US. Owning my first house mice...I think the love for cute images started right there and then. How could you not love these?
So it’s no surprise that I love teaching her new things. I’ve taught her a few things in sign language, so we can communicate better while she’s still learning how to speak. I’ve taught her to blow kisses. I’ve taught her what’s a dog and what’s a duck. The list goes on. I know as she gets older I will teach her even more like playing a musical instrument or writing a poem or how to knit. It’s amazing to watch her learn and pick up things so quickly. By far, she is my favorite student ever.
Booked at New York’s Colonial Theatre, she turned a potentially disastrous predicament to her advantage once again. She got wind that the Colonial had a band of rowdies that would always make trouble in the balcony, heckling new acts and so forth. She hung around outside before the show until she identified a young man she figured must be the ringleader of the clique. She then approached him and very frankly asked him to and his gang to be particularly kind to her as this was her Colonial debut. Don’t ask me how – perhaps he was flattered by the obeisance – but her stratagem worked.
9:00 – Phantogram, Light Pollution @ Maxwell’s $13
- having yet another camera break (from overuse probably)
Not many writers could make this seemingly crazy plot work. But Daniel Pinkwater's not just any writer. He has an incredible talent for making us question the everyday. In his hands, the absurd seems plausible and the plausible absurd. The lizards are a civilised community – they follow ‘schedules’ and are guided by the ‘truth’. Humans, are the other hand, are a far more worrying species (especially as seen through Victor’s eyes). As the chicken man explains, many of them ‘go through the motions of being human without really meaning or understanding it.’
Nars Danmari Blush Palette, more specifically Sin
That reminds me, where are all the romantics in this world, I heard recently that ladies are asked to do things, things they don’t want to do but you make them feel obligated to do them because guess what, you had no sense of mind, clarity of mind to make a move so that she would not feel obligated to carry out said action, but would go with it because she would feel the need to reciprocate the love.
In Mysticism, documentation is only a piece of a puzzle. It is not to be taken as the only form of truth. But, it can be combined with other elements – in order to prove a theory.
2. Post a photo of yourself & 11 random things about yourself.
And, Girls, Ladies and Blokettes, I haven’t forgotten you. In a few months time we’ll be back bigger and better with the return of Fanuary.
I can't wait to hear your responses, because I have found no matter how many DO support me, a little piece of me can't stop but think about those who do not and it is very hurtful. It does not make me feel better knowing I am in this alone......
Minimum and maximum heights from ground to lifting eye are 83-inches (2.1 m) and 113-inches (2.8 m) respectively. Maximum height to the top of the trolley is 113.5-inches (3.4 m). The maximum width of the A-frame when erected is 60.75-inches (1.54 m). The stored height of the A-frame is 100-inches (2.5 m).
Y los años, pasando y pasando,
A couple of days later and I decided to reorganise the bookshelves, as I couldn't find a particular book (again!). I'm not particularly obsessive about keeping things in order, and often can't remember book titles or author names, so sorting into genre made sense. It seemed manageable. Just genre, no alphabetical order of authors or titles.
I propose, therefore, that, beginning with the 2006 election, every congressional district in the country be cut in half as evenly as possible. As a result, the house of representatives will have 870 seats in place of the previous 435. The representatives will be somewhat more, well, representative.
“My son’s Upananyanam ceremony was held at home on ——. I know you’ll want to be informed and your blessings will always be with him”
the box while taking risks is wonderful. Let others try an edit what I have to say.
I'll meet you back here next Friday with an exercise.
The big problem is that foreign companies often have huge advantages over firms based in America.
During each of these periods,there are certain guidelines to be followed when it comes to cooking and consuming food stuffs.
3. Love and respect your brother or sister
"That's why they have wheels!"
Hope u liked it.
Paper Trimmer
have a wonderful website where you can find the most
*Shudder* - The haters who are being paid with public money to push hate crime against a minority consumer group
Please do let us know what you think of it. Leave a comment below or email us at hello@uncovercolombia.com.
The band insist that this song isn’t about paedophelia, just about “an eccentric local man we used to know”. However, with lyrics like “friendly man, look but don’t touch” and “mothers say stay away far as you can, friend-er-lee man”, they were treading a fine line – so fine you can probably only see it under a microscope, in fact. If this were issued now, The Daily Mail would probably run a front page story about it.
For bonuses, you may get:
Life is guiding us towards new levels of awareness and new states of being in order to help us align with the changes occurring within our reality. It is offering us the opportunity to step up before it becomes necessary to do so as a matter of survival. It is far preferable to consciously effect changes before change is urgently required, and thus to become the embodiment of change within the environment, rather than one who is forced to change by the shifting paradigms.
Nikolas awkwardly shook his hand and tried to retract it, but Lenny wouldn’t let go. “But you know my name,” he protested.
Hi everyone! Today I have a beauty from the OPI Amazing Spiderman Collection to show you! This is two coats of OPI Number One Nemesis with NYC top coat. This polish is a beautiful charcoal shimmer with flashes of green. It is the gray cousin of OPI Warm and Fozzie, which is one of my favorite polishes ever!
2/ The SNP are going to lose the independence referendum.
“Chicken… where aaaaare you?!” he called out into the cave. From a distance he heard a nervous cluck. Everyone else decided to roll over and get some sleep, and so Bantum wandered into the shadows at the back of the cave by himself. After an hour he came back and took a torch from the wall and returned to the back of the cave. Now he could see.
Not even May yet, and its been in the hundreds for days. Okay so maybe only a few days, but I guess the dread in my tone is because I know that once the hundreds are here, they're here to stay. We took the kids outside right after their chocolate oatmeal breakfast this morning, to break in a new box of cheapy sidewalk chalk that I had dumped out for them into an old basket- something that we've been without since we moved here 3 months ago. The chalk, not the basket.
Heat a large Dutch oven over medium heat then add the Canola Oil. Trim the fat off the Pork Roast then season all sides with Salt & Pepper. Brown the Pork on all sides. Meanwhile mix together the Ketchup, Vinegar, Garlic, Rosemary, and Hot Pepper Sauce. Add the Sauce and half of the Sliced Strawberries to the dutch oven. Make sure to cover the Pork roast with the BBQ Sauce. Bring to a boil, then reduce heat and simmer for 2 hours. Remove the tender Pork and loosely cover with tin foil and let rest for ten minutes.
To SIGN UP as a volunteer please call 214-969-9321 x228 or email:
9. Sorrow (10:40)
You probably thought this post was going to feature guys blasting away at the shooting range. On the contrary, the "Range" in question is the hulking Viking 6 Burner range that dominates my kitchen.
Just hand onto to your
BLOG ROLL:
Since we've been in La Paz we've had the pleasure of attending two "Dia De Los Reyes" celebrations at Judy and Alex's house. In a nutshell, on January 6 Judy and Alex invite people to their house, they serve wonderful Mexican hot chocolate and a delicious sweet bread called a "Rosca". As I've mentioned before, there are little plastic babies baked into the bread (I know, doesn't sound great, all that plastic melting into the bread!) and each person in attendance cuts their very own piece of bread off. There is a lot of laughter as the numbers of babies appear, there may be one baby or as many as five like happened this year. The bearer or bearer's of these plastic babies have the responsibility of providing a tamale dinner for all of those in attendance, which takes place on February 2. Here is Wikipedia's definition in case you want more information than my nutshell: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/King_cake
The first series of beeps and chirps comes from the world of nature in which we live and move every day. However, we all too frequently don’t notice the sights and sounds that call our attention to something higher, purer, more noble than the world of man’s creation that also surrounds us:
This has got to be the best sugar scrub I have EVER used! It left my hands feeling soft, clean and refreshed. I also love how the scrub comes in cubes. Makes it so much easier to use and trust me, ONE goes a long way! They looked so juicy and smelled so good my Hubby almost took a bite!!
But the hue of the sky remains blue....
The thing about newbies is that if you don't have any family or friends, you are going to learn everything yourself and pretty much the hard way. Yes, well we have a few family friends but they have spent a decent number of years here, and their been there done that , you think this is cold you ain't seen nothing attitude is frankly, a little patronising and full of urban legend . The kind of stories us Asian brown people fold into velvet cloths and put up on the shelves. Like our Holy books. So, to say anything contrariwise just makes you a blasphemous infidel.
... to Jesus right where I need to be!
push off and into the river, keep our eyes open, and
Maureen
Who are the real extremists? Who are the true 'haters'?
They didn’t get married after all.
Unfortunately, we went away for a weekend, and my ex’s in-laws are, to put it lightly, stupid. They didn’t feed or water them the whole weekend, and when we got back, they were gone. I did cry, not going to lie. When we asked what the hell happened, they said, they thought we got someone else to care for them. I figure, any other person would call if they had gotten someone else to watch their animals, but I guess they’re not smart enough to figure that one out. (Yes, I’m still bitter. I loved those ducks. I fall for animals pretty quickly.)
US veteran Sgt. Jacob George, who served in Afghanistan but now speaks out against the war, argued the agreement speaks to the futility of US military efforts in Afghanistan that began with the US invasion in 2001. “The agreement actually allows for sustaining a ‘post-conflict’ force of 20,000 to 30,000 troops for a continued training of indigenous forces. They are pretending this is something new, but it’s not. That’s what I was doing in 2001 — and 2002, 2003 and 2004. This is just disastrous, for ten years, with the greatest military the world has ever seen, we’ve been unable to defeat people with RPGs. And a year after Bin Laden was killed, we’re still planning to keep tens of thousands of troops there.”
But being a teenager, for us, is also about the freedom to make mistakes and to learn from them. About space to hang out with friends - yes in NewLook or to lounge on a streetcorner or in a busstop - not about having every minute of every day organised, CV building though this may be. About downtime, space for reflection, experimentation with clothes and hairstyles and identity, and mistakes and recalibration. About a diversity of pathways to a happy, satisfied life, not about one sole pathway, Endorsed by Authority, acclaimed by allcomers. And while some schools seemed to see it like that too, others, particularly the very high achieving ones, were clear that they begged to differ. If education is about good results alone, it was clear which schools were TheBest. Why then don't we want TheBest for our babe?
I had such a chaotic day yesterday. It was so frustrating . It started when J woke up psychotic. Which I try to ignore as much as possible not to trigger her more and just try to stay out of the way until J says or does something really over the top. That is when the phone rings and it is my mother. Nothing ever goes well with planning anything with my mother. We have been planning the trip of my daughter to come and see me this summer. Sounds, easy but it isn't. She calls and says she doesn't see the price of ticket that I see and the ticket she sees is about 400.00 more. I get on my computer and do a search and yep my price is right. I ask her what airport code she is using and hers is wrong. The complex part of getting the ticket is my daughter is 17 and you can't buy a ticket without airlines consent unless your 18. 17 is considered a child. It is very stupid to me but the rules are the rules.
On May 3rd, IU released the first music video teaser, ‘Peach’, to fans, which revealed IU sitting down on a couch with a notebook as she plays on her guitar, singing to the track to herself softly.
According to the Scottish Independent Advocacy Alliance (SIAA), “Independent advocacy is a way to help people have a stronger voice and to have as much control as possible over their own lives. Independent Advocacy organisations are separate from organisations that provide other types of services. An Independent Advocate will not make decisions on behalf of the person they are supporting. The Independent Advocate helps the person to get the information they need to make real choices about their circumstances and supports the person to put their choices across to others. An Independent Advocate may speak on behalf of people who are unable to do so for themselves.”
which was superbly organised by a lady called Sian.
I’m currently reading five books—a mishmash of titles that I highly recommend to anyone looking for a literary treat.
her- mom. you watched this same commercial a few minutes ago and you don't remember?
The Brickyard Pub (NoHo): Opening early at 1pm on Saturday for an all day fiesta. Enjoy $3 “fun shots”, $3 Tecates, and $4 margaritas as well as a menu of burgers, hot dogs, and nachos from their grill.
He watches as you tuck your kids in bed, fight with your wife, stay at work late, gossip with neighbors...
Go beyond your works and enrich someone’s else life!
In February, I finished my parent's Christmas present. Sadly, I DO mean their Christmas 2009 present!!!! Ridiculous I know, but they are my parents so they love me anyway!
The second way in which the Boston College subpoenas are dumb is because they are so politically stupid. Ostensibly, the subpoenas are in pursuit of the perpetrators of the murder of Jean McConville, but anyone who is familiar with the case knows that it is really about getting Gerry Adams who is alleged to have given the order to “disappear” Mrs McConville, an accused spy for the British Army.
Just start writing, drawing, or dancing (or whatever creative play you are called to do)…going deeper and deeper. Embrace it all— the pain as well as the bliss. The unfettered heart has an infinite capacity to divinely transform all that comes through its doors. It knows no boundary of limitation and creates pathways to Beauty wherever the attention is placed.
Stamps: Waltzingmouse - Celtic Heritage, Irish Blessings
Robin allowed us into the old orchard and gardens. They are overgrown and runaway now but once they must have been wonderful. There is this 180 degree view of Oban harbour and the islands on that brilliant blue water. There are still the remains of some of the greenhouse foundations.
If you feel led, another way you can be involved is to help provide financial support. As you know, this kind of trip can be costly. Donations can be mailed to Theresa Baptist Church at 3919 Chub Lake Road Roxboro, NC 27574. Be sure to include "Megan Hall Yucatan Mission Trip" on the check. If you would like to know more about our trip and the organization we will be working with, you can visit www.dcimissiontrips.com. While there, be sure to check out the videos section.
The world cracks like an egg. Darkness spills in.
Changes have also been made to the sitting arrangement of polling or counting agents at polling centres. The changes were gazetted on Feb 14 along with the use of indelible ink.
There is a game played amongst the gods called The Social Experiment. Imagine it as a grand game of "What if?"
(Chicken by-products that are later dyed to look more appealing to consumers).
When I first moved to my “smaller” town I was pretty stupid. I didn’t understand certain basic facts of small town life, such as that barbecuing is mandatory, hunting is not considered barbaric, and grocery shopping is for socializing, not just for shopping. In fact, my first grocery shopping experience here was rather traumatic. As I emptied my cart contents onto the conveyor, the checkout woman started talking. I glanced nervously around to see to whom this conversation was directed, but when I verified that I was alone, I naturally assumed that she was off of her medication.
Although Respondent does not raise the issue, we believe it is appropriate to state our conclusion that Holloway comports with the Supreme Court’s later holding in Strickland v. Washington, 466 U.S. 668, 692, 104 S.Ct. 2052, 2067, 80 L.Ed.2d 674 (1984). In Strickland, the Court held that to set aside a judgment based on ineffective assistance of counsel, the defendant must demonstrate prejudice. See id. at 668, 104 S.Ct. at 2052. The Court also stated that for purposes of conflict of interest, “[p]rejudice is presumed only if the defendant demonstrates that [ ] ‘an actual conflict of interest adversely affected his lawyer’s performance.’ ” 466 U.S. at 692, 104 S.Ct. at 2067 (quoting Cuyler, 446 U.S. at 348, 100 S.Ct. at 1718). Despite its restrictiveness, we do not interpret this language as evidencing an intention on the part of the Supreme Court to overrule its earlier pronouncement in Holloway that prejudice is presumed without a showing of actual conflict when a defendant makes a timely objection to joint representation and the trial court fails to inquire adequately into the basis of the objection. Strickland specifically stated that a “fairly rigid rule of presumed prejudice for conflicts of interest” is reasonable given the obligation of counsel to avoid conflicts and the “ability of trial courts to make early inquiry in certain situations likely to give rise to conflicts.” 466 U.S. at 692, 104 S.Ct. at 2067. Thus, Strickland’s requirement of a showing of actual conflict presupposes that trial courts conduct an appropriate inquiry when the defendant properly raises the issue. Holloway, however, addresses the situation where the trial court fails to make such inquiry in the face of the defendant’s timely objection. As a result, the Strickland rule requiring a defendant to demonstrate an actual conflict of interest in order to obtain a presumption of prejudice is inapplicable to a Holloway-type case. We therefore conclude the holding in Holloway–i.e., that prejudice is presumed when the trial court fails to either appoint separate counsel or make an adequate inquiry, in the face of the defendant’s timely objection–satisfies Strickland’s prejudice requirement without a showing of actual conflict.
There are mountain views, valley views, original pioneer cabins and outbuildings (not reproductions), waterfalls, roaring rivers, calm ponds, and a host of wildlife. I photographed a bear that was visible from the car! The possibilities really seem endless. The changing light and the ever varying cloud cover with intermittent fog makes each scene in the park change almost hourly.
But Kerala is lovely. We charted a boat that we thought was going to look like this:
Like most police forces, the RCMP has been a bastion of tough, white men that under-represents women and ethnic groups. Meanwhile, Canada has grown ever more multicultural. The country's population is 51 per cent women, 15 per cent visible minorities and 4 per cent aboriginal, according to 2006 census data. (The Mounties do over-represent aboriginals in their ranks, given they often patrol those communities.
Christ has been raised from the dead, *
Flash forward to 40. I've kind of forgotten that time. I haven't thought about it in a while anyway.
Yet Obama has waged a rhetorical war against the Chamber of Commerce and who do they represent, you guessed it, most small and medium-sized domestic businesses. Obama blasted the Chamber of Commerce for daring to oppose his plan to tax such businesses at a rate of 39.6%.
I am also teaching a Beginning Reading and Writing course at Fordham University this semester and continuing my doctoral journey with Dissertation Seminar. After two months off (two months!) I am ready to plunge back into hectic pace that is my life the rest of the year.
2) In the opened Microsoft Windows Update window click on “Change Settings” in the left grey column.
Judging by those promotional materials (including the extremely understated video
Cordelia is searching for the father she’s never known, a man as infamous for his wild parties as he is for his shadowy schemes. Overnight, she enters a world more thrilling and glamorous than she ever could have imagined and more dangerous. It’s a life anyone would kill for . . . and someone will.
2 desire
They precede a breathtaking raven-haired lady whose face is hidden by a veil. She advances with slow and sacral steps. Besides her hair I can only see her snow-white forehead and shiny sea-green eyes.
1 Temperance Lane, Sydney
Good Morning and welcome to this week's challenge - this week we are going Vintage and we'd love you to play along too. We will be selecting one random winner who will receive a $5 gift certificate to Phindy's store and the Design Team will also choose one entry as Card of the Week. The creator of that card will also receive a $5 gift certificate to Phindy's store and will be in the running for one of our monthly Guest Designer spots. You don't have to use a Phindy's image to participate but we like it so much when you do that we let you enter it twice.
I know I cried a couple times or more
1. Act! That's right, act out the things that you do on a frequent basis when it comes to using your space. Go through the daily motions of sorting your mail, paying bills, filing your paperwork, writing out a card, etc... think about what works and what doesn't. What makes any of those tasks difficult or an annoyance?
The pure symbology here blows my ever-expanding (and crashing) mind! The serpent, feathered to boot!! Bringing in the kundalini energy from above (represented by the feathers) and below (the serpent itself.) I find it very wonderfully interesting they have a serpent descending… moving down to earth. The very missing link I wrote about a week or so ago.
And this is my 200th post. Hooray! My giveaway post will be up right after this. :)
The Dedringers @ The Basement – this Austin band is hittin’ the road and getting some great airplay... Check out their song “Institution”!
They that go down to the sea in ships, that do business in great waters;
because you let yourself be mediocre.
Henry Ward Beecher was once about to take a ride behind a horse which he had hired from a livery stable. He regarded the horse admiringly, and remarked: “That is a fine-looking animal. Is he as good as he looks?” The owner replied: “Mr. Beecher, that horse will work in any place you put him, and do all that any horse can do.” The preacher eyed the horse still more admiringly, and then remarked: “I wish to goodness he was a member of my church!”
6. Lata Mangeshkar: Sabse Buri Sharab Hai
lists
“In control once more, Rajiir made his way down to the courtyard to check the bodies. After I retrieved my arrows and took their coin, I drew my blade and crept around the corner to check for others. Sure enough, there were two more bandits sitting up ahead. I stalked forward silently, deciding not to call upon the skills of the Hunter for this fight. Rajiir could handle this himself. I came around the corner and brought my blade hard into the first bandit, catching her unaware. She staggered, leaving an opening for a second blow that felled her. I turned to the remaining bandit and brought my blade up just in time to block his savage swing. Using the pommel, I bashed his face, causing him to drop his guard long enough for me to deliver the killing blow. I grabbed his shoulder for leverage and rammed my blade up through his chest. He coughed and sputtered, clutching at the wound as he slid off the sword and fell to the ground. I checked their bags for useful gear and then moved on. I had just taken out five bandits. It was good work. I had made Dawnstar proud, though they would never know it.
Cetyl Alcohol – Wax found in spermaceti from sperm whales or dolphins. Alternatives: Vegetable cetyl alcohol (e.g., coconut), synthetic spermaceti.
The contests here and at Blog Buddies and reviewers' sites are ongoing with different closing dates. The Grand Prize Drawing here is on Wednesday, March 30th. Scroll down to check out all the stuff and links. Now, I must get back to work on the next full-length novel in the series, Sweet Bytes. I also have another shorter tale in mind, but I don't know if it'll fly yet.
After completing hospital formalities her father, Mr.Sabir brought Hina’s body home.
This is about the time of year we begin to hear laments about the "commercialization of Christmas." Christmas, it seems, has become nothing more than a materialistic bacchanalia celebrating the worst aspects of our greed, all for the purposes of corporate exploitation. It has always struck me as odd that a holiday dedicated to buying things for other people should be denounced in these terms. The guy who otherwise spends his money on a new BMW and fancy clothes for himself, instead spends it on gifts for his relatives and friends. This is a bad thing? Money represents buying power and nothing else. The question is ultimately not whether it should be spent, but on what it will be spent. An annual celebration that involves a cultural tradition of spending your money on others seems like it should be far down our list of social sins.
Heifer’s mission: “to work with communities to end hunger and poverty while caring for the earth.”
(self-released)
Could the deer pellets in reference be any of the drug-fueled, wildly inflammatory statements (including references to drugging a child) tweeted in the hours prior to this exchange? While it may be all in fun and games for city councilmembers with “tee time at 9am,” there are plenty of folks here who don’t find statements such as these in good taste, particularly for a city councilmember and his blogging associate.
AleSmith Brewing Company AleSmith Speedway Stout
I know you guys have got to be sick already of coming to my site and reading sad things. Reading about cancer, about death, about the sucky stuff that comes after both. I want to write about my mind-blowingly awesome life, because believe me, I have one. But for some reason, it is rare that my heart pulls my body to my laptop to tell you about how great the sunshine felt on any given day... instead, puppet strings grip my hands and land them right here on the keyboard as soon as tears are shed. (And you guys wonder why I don't write as often as you'd like:))
*I usually use the brown rice spiral pasta from Trader Joe’s, but to be honest, Tinkyada GF pastas are the best.
The next step is to take a clean washcloth and soak it in hot steamy water (but not scalding hot). Wring it out and cover your face with it. You want to steam your face to open your pores. Allow it to sit until cloth gets cold. Then gently wipe the oil from your face. Repeat this two or three times, it's up to you (although some people only do it once and are satisfied). I can tell you I steamed 3 times total and I would have continued but hubby was off last night and wanted some snuggle time! The steaming was almost as enjoyable as the massage and it was just as relaxing. Definitely a fabulous way to unwind before bed!
Oral arguments of this case are scheduled for March 26th, but the decision is not expected to be handed down until late June.
ARTIST: So I know you said you are all fatigued from doing studio visits, but would you consider stopping by the kitchen to see some objects and what's nots? And see what the opposite of what Jake looks like. (1)
The daily intake of honey and cinnamon powder strengthens the immune system and protects the body from bacteria and viral attacks. Researches have found that honey has various vitamins and iron in large amounts and its use strengthens the white blood corpuscles.
the girl would say, have you ever been? Yes, I would say,
One person I used to work with has almost 2000 "friends" now. I see that as over the top. What's the point? You might as well run for President! I guess it all boils down to why you are using Facebook. For me, it was reconnecting.
Soak for about one hour in a large bowl of cold water in the refrigerator.
There’s a danger involved in putting together a list of the worst in reality television because at some point the number of titles starts to grow unwieldy. What began with a list best described as ‘at least half the reality shows on television’ had to be narrowed down to only ten series, but even that list looked too long, so the boot was given to shows involving Kardashian sisters, David Hasselhoff trading places with another person named David Hasselhoff and the gargantuan noise factory that is The X Factor. So with some fairly bad shows sitting this list out it should be pretty apparent how genuinely awful the following shows are.
I have made all the preparations. There's a humble, but survivable, nest of savings set aside and I am arranging alternative health insurance through my local chamber of commerce. I have projects lined up and much work and writing ahead of me, not to mention the workshops and events here at the farm. I am not asking for any help from the readers, and won't. This is my choice and my life and I can't spend any more time of it behind a desk working for somebody else. I have to make this step or I'll never be able to respect myself. I am thrilled and somber about it. Making this decision is a step I have been hesitating over out of nothing but fear. Fear isn't welcome here anymore. Ever.
08 Shred of Evidence
An estimated 35,000 collectors, curators, architects, interior designers, art advisors and new enthusiasts attend the Chicago exposition annually.
Jumping backwards abit to oh say December 14,2009 I was supposed to announce a winner for my questions when we were announcing that Heidi was the newest Angel. The winner was Sherbear and Braunc 13. I got in touch with them and they each received one of the winter release Glimmer mists.
This week has been pretty chilled out, we have actually started house hunting.
♥ Lots of natural light/heat requiring less electricity.
Places - from the hanging gardens of Babylon to a Jarrow privy (whether used by the Venerable Bede, or by Ellen Wilkinson) - aren't so hard: research helps - and we'd talk about how to do it. Google Earth helps too, along with old maps and contemporary accounts... and yet, would you only include what the people of the time would see or think of? Are we not 21st century visitors to that time and place? But still, if you add a substantial helping of common sense, you then just need a willingness to dream in all six senses.
Suggested letter for your U.S. Representative
from their own land by their own people,
What do you think? I'm not sure I'd call it steampunk, but it's been around for 5+ years, which makes it an early incarnation of the style. The fact that it's lasted that long in Austin also tells me it resonates with a lot of people as a comfortable place to hang out.
Would love some other ideas for healthy burger toppings.
PRESERVING THE IMAGE
A word to Country Living for Next Year.....
If the President wants to extend the temporary cuts in loan interest rates, then say that the economy is not in good shape, especially for recent grads, and increasing the rates will further hurt the economy. You can’t preach about recovery and a better economy one day, and the next talk about the need to extend economic relief. Don’t shit in one hand and then try to sell me fertilizer with the other Mr. President.
Outside in the hall the sound of the kid’s voices were exactly like the day I first met Mary. It was my freshman algebra class and I quickly found myself struggling to supply the level of work her keen mind demanded. Mary was a gifted student and in a better place, she could have done anything she wanted with her life but Fate was cruel and had saddled her with too many obstacles.
Me: Daddy too.
To get back to the soul of his work, world renowned photographer Jim Brandenburg sets himself the task of taking only one photograph each day for the ninety days of fall. The landscape he chooses is his home – the boreal forest of northern Minnesota.
May this be a place where we gather at that table where meet Jesus in the breaking of bread, fellowship, and the prayers. May the teaching of the apostles be ringing in our ears as we give and receive the gift of hospitality with friends, strangers and enemies.
I think they would make a great gift, don't you?
Ok. I need to apologize in advance. I was walking through the stalls . . . and saw this beautiful chair (loving the upholstery textile!) and desk . . . took a picture . . . and can't for the life of me remember the name of the dealer. My hope is that someone reading might recall - just leave it in the comments and I can update the post.
I love my PJ style trousers. I got them a couple of years ago and now I’m super glad they are in fashion. I no longer get funny looks from people who think that I’m just too lazy to get ready.
Good hunting,
This morning I got a phone call from Mr. W. to come over & get the latest load of goodies for the tortoises. A HUGE load of cucumbers for my reptiles & half a watermelon for me. The blue carry-all -- with just the cucumbers alone -- weighed in at 19 pounds !!
Gathered up all our stuff,
The Obama campaign rolled out its new slogan, “Forward,” on Monday, and the great hyperspace peanut gallery took it upon itself to weigh in on the sourcing. Personally, I just hope Davids Axelrod and Plouffe didn’t spend too much of my latest (meager) donation on this one, because it’s about as revolutionary as promising A Brighter Tomorrow. Everyone, from the local dentist to General Electric to — and I’m just guessing here — Mussolini probably guaranteed a brighter tomorrow. And “Forward” works as well for Toyota or a high school marching band as it does for Obama. It’s so general, in fact, that you’d think it would be hard to criticize on specific, nitpicky grounds. But God bless the Internet, because it excels at nothing better than dredging up nitpicky criticism. To wit:
Ok, got that out of the way, I'm getting some Warrior IPA. Had this one a couple years back but never reviewed. Instead I slammed the whole bomber.
Large Eggs, 4 whole or optional 7 Eggwhites only, for fewer total calories.
If the last post was about the PAST, this one is about the PRESENT.
The fact that "Florence" was not identified as an alien during what was apparently a lengthy hospital stay involving several medical examinations suggests that either the species was either extremely Near-Human or able to modify their biology to fool less sophisticated scanners without the need for assimilated biomatter.
Claude Monet: Last week, Sotheby's sold 'The Effect of Spring at Giverny,' for $15.2 million, the seventh-highest price ever paid for a Monet at auction.
Where there was once a unbreakable bond you now see severed ties,
The final chapter of Bernard Cornwell's Warlord Chronicles, and what an ending! Continuing the themes of love, loyalty and betrayal, Excalibur begins with the aftermath of Lancelot's rebellion and the devastating effect on Arthur and Guinevere's marriage.
Where the fuck did 4 trains go?!
I stare in awe, no shame to pander,
Because this is how natural learning works - it's very focused and individual. It's how such people as Einstein and Newton spent their childhoods - not that we all want to raise mini-Einsteins or Newtons. It's just for the love of our children that we allow them to learn freely and not to be tied down to "You must do half an hour of maths now." Many of us have learned, through trial and error, that when you try to force a child to sit down and "do half an hour of maths now", you engender a hatred of the subject, whereas when you're spontaneously counting flower petals (or spider's legs) in the garden, it's an entirely different matter. And the two activities - the forced maths and the spontaneous counting - are often mutually incompatible.
Some time back I created a man. I called him Sardonic Scholar. He was a busy body who send unsolicited mail to people on my contact list. At the time, I believed that people would find his point of view more acceptable if it was coming from a man. I think differently now. If you're interested in hearing what my alter ego has to say (more like 'has had to say') go here
Of somewhat small note are some recipe changes made to a couple of the year-round beers. First off, the the Seven now uses a combination of roughly half pilsener malt and half organic pale malt as it's base along with a small decrease in the munich malt, making the beer a tad lighter both in color and mouthfeel as well. We like the change and hope you do too. The second beer that changed is less likely to have such a difference in flavor or appearance (just brewed it today, we'll see) but good news nonetheless - our main malt supplier (Great Western of Vancouver WA) now has organic wheat malt which has replaced the former conventional product we were using. It looked, smelled and tasted great. That makes the Four and Five both about 95% organic and even more local which is important to us.
Wait, what? Earn free clothes? Yes! Who wouldn’t like to earn free clothes? Gather some of your favorite people together and host a party in your home with Trunk’d Clothing. Depending on the sales volume the hostess will earn a percentage of the total sales to be used towards clothing and accessories with Trunk’d Clothing. In addition, as the party sales are totaled up there is a chance to earn a 50% discount off one item. The more sales that are generated the more items you can earn with 50% off.
7. The nation will then receive her full blessing
When my father was dying of cancer ten years ago, one Religious of Jesus and Mary sister took a four-hour train ride to visit him in the hospital for an hour, stayed overnight at a nearby convent, and the next morning took the train home, for another four-hour journey. When I thanked her, she thanked me for the “honor” of letting her come. And during a difficult spiritual crisis, one Sister of St. Joseph helped me to find God in the midst of my doubts, and was even able to get me to smile. “God did all the work,” she said, when I thanked her, “not me.”
Thanos! Very good indeed.
Small handful of croutons
I've mentioned the historic and strategic position of the bridge and although it's now mostly overshadowed by Guardbridge in terms of importance, it's still a lifeline route for the residents of Kemback, Pitscottie, Ceres and other houses in-between.
Concrete Jungle Boy
“Not only three reactor meltdowns but seven pool fires at Fukushima Daiichi,” Kamps said. “If the site had to be abandoned by all workers, then everything would come loose. The end result of that was the evacuation of Tokyo.”
I've got to hand it to Linda. When she suggested that we all pick a project that we've been procrastinating and commit to finishing it by the end of April, I thought, "piece of cake". But the honest truth is that if I hadn't participated in her Spring Into Action challenge, my fabric swatch would still be taped to my guest bath window, and that window would still be naked. Gotta love the power of peer pressure. This is why I am happy to report that my DIY relaxed roman shade is done!
Chester het intussen besef watse vreeslike fout hy begaan het:
Spilling, cursing and storytelling
I'm playing in Jeffrey Osthoff's Aeternal Realm of Sylvaeon game, which is due to transition to BRP, but is currently operating under OSRIC/AD&D. My Grey Elf Paladin of the White Lady/Druid is 2/2, and together with her great companions, is hex-crawling through a cool, low-magic, high-fantasy setting.
Hence time travel in mind, though a reality, seems futile
and it never sounds bad.
Emerging from the woodland shade at the summit, southern England stretches about before me. The magnificent view from Box Hill on a good day encompasses Dorking in the foreground, Leith Hill in the near distance, across Surrey and Sussex as far as the South Downs. Towards the south east, planes are taking off from Gatwick Airport at an alarming angle. What is not visible, however, is London which is to the north as I point out to a young couple when asked.
I've been in the garden of late and looking at today the weather has cooled and dulled a bit but not before I've gotten the lawns trimmed and the flower beds done.
If you are in Drumheller, AB and you hear rocks fly and the engine roaring that would be me!
0:01: Why are you not wearing a shirt? Will this be a theme for the entire video?
Bad boy Shaun's Hard Time (just published) covers the 26 months he spent in the jail system with the highest rate of death in America – a jail run by the infamous Sheriff Joe Arpaio in Phoenix, Arizona. While incarcerated, he illicitly began one of the world's first prison blogs, Jon's Jail Journal, which attracted international attention when the Guardian published extracts. The site highlights his and others' experiences of the 'barbaric and subhuman conditions in which filth, squalor and disease are the norm.' I shall be running an interview with Shaun shortly.
I ought to get a few things sorted out. And, actually, I think I will. Nothing can be done until Monday, save perhaps a little list being created. A few things are actually in the works, but the two big things would be contacting the school (and maybe getting in this term) and contacting the broker about a house. There are other things, but these are the most pressing or time sensitive.
The article went, : “About a year later, the boy became the first person from mainland China to attend Harrow, one of Britain’s most exclusive private schools, which according to its website currently charges £30,930 annually.“
c) You can double the recipe easily if you have many guests or if you like this salsa as much as we do at home.
Together they worked in the garden and communed with God freely, but one day, the unthinkable happened. Under deception, but still in direct disobedience, both Adam and Eve ate of the forbidden tree. Their eyes were opened and they were ashamed of their nakedness, so they sewed together fig leaves to make loin clothes for themselves. They heard God walking in the garden and hid from him, only to be called out and questioned.
I've just realised I've had a bit of a fairy theme this week without noticing! So the finishes I can show you are a new Christmas mushroom fairy house. I make up the embroidery as I go and this time came over all festive :-) Here's the front door.......
It’s finally a weekend!! I am doing a happy dance just for that :)
“Your list of the common extent of accomplishments has too much truth. The word is applied to many a woman who deserves it not otherwise than by netting a purse or covering a screen; but I am very far from agreeing with you in your estimation of ladies in general. I cannot boast of knowing more than half a dozen, in the whole range of my acquaintance, that are really accomplished.” (I admit to having no artistic inclinations. If Mr. Darcy detested those who feign artistic skills when none exist, he and I would do well together.)
A Place Beyond The Map by Samuel Thews
There are many varieties and colors of lentils, including brown, yellow, black, orange, red and green. Beluga lentils are black and one of the smallest varieties of lentils, having an appearance similar to caviar.
the hammer would even miss
Primark t-shirt and cardigan
Then finally I've been led to the Brave Girls Club, if you haven't read this post then please go do so now...I'll wait. ... ... ... ... ... ... :-D ... ... ... ... ... The idea of this club (and I've only looked at it a little bit, so this is my very first impression) is something that seems to be the theme of my evening. Wonderful, strong, passionate, creative women empowering others to follow their dreams. What a great place the internet can be!
Weeks spent hospital-visiting and such but not all of my time has been taken up with depressing fayre. I had a cruise round the Med for a week with Dearest, Eldest, Youngest and Youngest's Darlin'. (Soon to become Mrs Youngest - in Austria no less. August 17th). The cruise was courtesy of Dearest's redundancy payment. She treated the kids and myself. We booked early enough to qualify for free all-inclusive which meant that the entire week we gorged on fabulous food and too much drink. Sadly I was boat-bound for three days with a recurrence of my achilles problem but I only missed a few places.
For a few months in 2001, I dated a really nice boy. He was a Boy Scout, literally. And the son of a preacher man. Literally. He was really nice.
being selfish … doesn’t pay
In South Africa we are wrapped up in human and political problems and we have not begun to look at these issues. However there is no reason from a human-development point of view why we should not reform our tax structure. Taxing 'bads' rather than 'goods' will provide us with a long-term perspective and vision which is almost entirely absent in the current system.
71. Bumped Megan McCafferty
She wondered why she was there. She wondered why she had come. She wondered why her heart was so desperate for a ray of light. She wondered how desperate her soul must be if she was willing to come here.. all the way here. The cafe was tiny and had a dusty damp smell. She looked around, and saw the room was lit with green uncovered bulbs and the walls were old bricks, scathed with the memories, she though, of words spoken and lost. She wondered how soon she can leave, how fast she should run. She realized how wrong it was to be there.
How does the saying go? April showers bring forth May flowers, we're sure going to have a glorious May judging by the amount of rain we've had in the UK. I live on the North East coast and compared to the south we've got off quite lightly, I think they might have been a bit premature with the hosepipe ban, lol.
Obama: Then, I suggest you go read it.
...still craving my parents approval...
For the Buttercream: Combine whites, sugar, and salt in bowl of standing mixer; set bowl over saucepan containing 1 1/2-inches of simmering water. Whisk constantly until mixture is opaque and warm to the touch and registers about 160 degrees on an instant-read thermometer. If you're using pasteurized egg whites you can stop as soon as the sugar is dissolved, but 160 is the temp needed to kill bacteria, so I always go to this temp. I have had good luck with Trader Joes pasteurized egg whites, they always whip up so you can certainly try these instead of plain whites.
Oh, everyone's work inspires me. I have hundreds of blogs subscribed to in my Google Reader and I spend a lot of time every day scrolling through it, oohing and ahhing over the creations I see. Even if I'm not overly fond of the total creation or the image, many times the colors or a particular embellishment or technique will shout out to me. They are all great, from the most simple to the most complex; great because they are hand made by someone who loves the hobby as much as I do. Blogs, forums, and galleries are just full of eye candy and inspiration!
Reading the advertisement, I learned that the ranch and the house were built in 1961 and that the property, 15 acres, was slated for development. Where once horses roamed and orange trees grew, where walnuts and lemons blossomed, those times and those days, of ranch and farm, are gone.
But apparently the government doesn’t trust him either, as they have him arrested and thrown in jail for possibly knowing that there could be clean unpolluted air outside the shield, and the exact coordinates at which one can find it. McLeod, however, is busy fighting Ironside, although the fight is not actually resolved so much as just…temporarily stopped. The movie then fades into McLeod’s new love interest sleeping – I really don’t think transitioning from a fight scene into someone sleeping is a good way to get your audience hooked.
Below that key, you should see a 9.0 key. Select the 9.0 registry key.
We take life as it comes at us, for we can never predict with any certainty what will transpire in our future.
Relationships take many forms: romantic, passionate, physical, family, friendly, acquaintance. In each of these the photographer will have chosen to show the image in a particular way. The changing relationship between photographer and subject may also be visible in different images (length of time, mood).
April 1– Tuesday– New York City– The New York Times reports that a Mr W.B. Mackenzie “who has now the management of the celebrated United States Mantilla and Cloak Emporium of Mr George Carey,” was in Paris, France, early last month, ordering elegant ladies fashions for the New York store. “The world-renowned beauties of the Republican Court at Washington, as well as those of the Commercial Metropolis (New-York,) may well congratulate themselves upon having a person so competent to cater to their good taste as Mr. Mackenzie.”
Do you see it? And how bizarre and unjust we are in the Christian church! The thing smacks of the religion of the Pharisees who strain out a gnat and swallow the camel. We are more prepared (though there are many who even refuse this) to grant as grounds for divorce – desertion – than we are for active, ongoing verbal, physical, emotional abuse! But surely the latter is the greater evil. God repeatedly uses the argument from the lesser to the greater in Scripture, and therefore we are justified in doing the same. If we strain out a gnat, then let’s be sure to strain out the camel too!
Why must I go about mourning,
When Chad and I first decided we were ready for babies - we assumed that it would happen quickly and easily. After the first couple of months, you are still hopeful, but as the months go on, and nothing happens, the hope diminishes. If you are fairly young - the docs don't even really want to hear from you until you have been trying for 6-12 months. You try everything. Ovulation tests, temperature tracking, keeping your hips elevated after sex - certain that one of these methods will be the answer. When it's not, it's devastating. No matter how obsessed your NOT going to get about getting pregnant, I have seen few succeed. The desire for a baby is not the same as the desire for a new pair of shoes, or a darling purse. Slowly it consumes you. As the months go by, you see friends and family members celebrate their pregnancies. As much as you love your friends and family, and want to be genuinely happy,it just hurts so much. Why them? Why not me?
So far, my favorite is the half-suede-cloth/half-flannel diaper. It's easier to stuff than the just-flannel diapers, and having just suede cloth against Little Man's skin seems to control diaper rash the best. I use these most at night, because I can stuff them with three inserts (this is for a toddler; Little Man only used one or two inserts as an infant).
References:
That's a good reason to hold on to beads you might not like that much. One day you might discover something in them that you never saw before or you find something else that could use those half forgotten beads, tucked away behind the more attractive ones, to complete the design. You just never know.
It was always a strange house; an old lodge that had once marked the entrance to a much grander building. A bungalow, built in the shape of a cross; it had a series of rooms leading off each other, each of them tiny, and each of them impossible to keep warm.
9. I actually like munching on raw vegetables. Even without dip.
“One reason God created time was so that there would be a place to bury the failures of the past.”-unknown
And we first saw him on May 10th, 2010.
This new novel will shortly be made into proofs, and face the copy-editor's pen, and although I am immensely relieved I shall also miss the story - having been immersed for two long years. So, to make up for any sense of loss and to show some of the art that inspired my work I'd like to make a 'picture post'...
Here among you, my stars
Doei!
And you know, something just changes
I wanted to do a lot more with my indoor Halloween decor this year, but got caught up in school work and other life problems. I did manage to get around to a few DIY projects, and a few simple changes to the house to "Halloween-ify" a bit, and here they are:
Then I dribbled some crackle glaze over the top and coloured this with a copper krylon pen, Shrink plastic wings and a clay heart and clay word - friendship..
The rain was still falling, but there was no place I would rather be than getting chummy in my Chum Spa Villa. We watched the football. It was grand final weekend after all.
" There is. Can we please proceed with the check out?" I inquired while holding a fistful of twenties.
The Block is a townhouse project near Kingsway and East 12th. As sales campaigns go, theirs at least tries to be rooted in strategy. This is unusual in Vancouver condo marketing. For many years, the captains of consciousness couldn’t escape coffee cups and spelling mistakes. The Block’s print ad, with a professional couple cramped over pasta dinner, is not only cute and coffee cup-free, it also speaks to a target audience: condo owners looking to upgrade.
In high schools today, young girls get gifts of flowers, candy, soft toys, and more from their sweethearts. It is a controversial subject within the schools as many girls are left out and stigmatized for not getting things, and/or having a boyfriend. Some boys and girls give gifts to each other secretly, while some girls give gifts openly to each other. No matter what your take on this, it is still a sign of love being shared.
The addition of a bail to the back of the piece made this embellishment wearable.
If I ever strike it rich, I will likely donate to several causes, including funding scholarships for my undergraduate institution (Roanoke College), sending money to the SENS Foundation (research on aging and age related diseases), and creating a trust that buys academic journals and provides them free of charge for public viewing.
J: Rock or Country music.
More twist of the wrist stories you will hear.
And in its place I regained my full self‐determinism and clarity of mind to effectively be able to postulate the future. Gone were the accumulated evaluations and invalidations received as part and parcel of every interaction with the church. And in its place I found a peace and inner happiness that evidently is native in me. Gone were the multitude of instances in which I had to choose to either “go up the Bridge to OT” or agree to something I knew was a basic violation of my own integrity.
The women, who had pre-existing incontinence problems, all went to Mr Rowland between the mid-1990s and 2007.
Nice. Darker than most warmers, it pours brown like a bock with reddish amber highlights and a nice tan head.
Bertie cocked his head to one side and opened his eyes very wide. “Yes, Reg…inald.” He whispered a tiny mewl and started to walk by putting each paw very purposefully on the smoothest bits of earth he could find. He looked like he was walking on hot oil.
If you monitored cyberspace during those early hours of that fateful day you could have written a prize-winning drama. This cyberspace record would have given us the totality of what happened and the feelings of those involved.
Love ya Mom! Couldn't have been here without you!
Tonight's Full Moon is the annual Super Moon. When the moon is perigee and closest to the earth than it will be all year.. Expect The Unexpected.
My otter stayed in her room, back home, when I moved out. And up until today, Marissa’s leopard has perched on the top shelf of the entertainment center in my apartment. I’ve thought about putting it away. There’s no reason that I need to see it every day, and I certainly want it safe. But I couldn’t. I didn’t. And just now, my roommate Abby, burdened and disoriented by a load of painting supplies, bumped into the entertainment center, knocking it off the top. “Oh, Ta –” she says, dropping her stuff and tripping over herself.
Entering the room
Find yourself searching for TV shows, local news or even Google mapping your old neighbourhood? (Yes, this does happen). You’re trying to virtually transport yourself back to the familiarity of your pre-university years.
Once you have mixed the batter with dye to your desired hue, add cupcake liners to your pan. Now it's time to layer the batter. I followed the ROYGBIV scheme, beginning with red, and added a spoonful to each liner. Next, I put a spoonful of orange on top of the red, repeating the process until all six colors are layered in each liner. After two layers, it became apparent to me that I was spooning too much of each color into the liners. I kind of had to keep going once I started, since, unlike a solid color batter, it's not possible to spoon "just a bit" out. Doing that would blend the batter, rather than layering it, and would not result in the rainbow effect I was going for. By the time I came around to the purple, there was only room in the liner for a dollop. At this point I knew, once baked, the tops would be overflowing and not very pretty, but this is a learning process!
So I mention this to my friend Andrea who suffers from migraines a lot. She tells me about cervical injections that the AZ Pain Center offers for permanent migraine relief.
1 cup chopped, unpeeled apple
Swordfishtrombones is the album that took Waits from the gruff voiced crooner to the ravaged, rough style that would be his later records. The genius of it is, the songs got better.
The last few days I have had a heavy heart due to the low morale and political division in the USA right now. To this was added the self-confessed mass murder committed in Norway by the right-wing militant anti-multiculturalist Anders Behring Breivik. But rather than focus on the negative and the stupid, I decided to focus on something positive.
For yourself: Visit your favorite watering hole, order your favorite beer, and then order one for the person sitting next to you and wish them a happy holiday!
The corpse of Zagnazerak raised his empty hand high and called forth “Simak!” Then he cast the other blade.
in a few weeks.
It just so happened that Regis has donated a large sum of money to ND to open a media center for students wishing to get communications and theater arts majors and the like, and he showed up for the groundbreaking ceremony. The campus was abuzz--"Holy shit, Regis is here and we're getting a new building! Huzzah!"--but I didn't think too much of it. I was wandering through the main corridor of the library when I looked up and saw a bunch of people decked out in their fanciest clothes standing near the exit.
He speaks for those with whom he abides on the other side of the isle.
Its only OK to express myself if I do it His way. Expressing myself through means He doesn’t like, like sex, is worthy of my painful death.
Mix together 4 1/2 teaspoons (or 2 packages of yeast) with 1/2 cup of warm together in mixing or large bowl
I'm a fan of the color scheme in this cover. It's very elegant.
Fair point, except the difference that’s come over this show in just one week is phenomenal.
As well as incongruity as a basis for humour there is another theory that goes all the way back to Plato and Aristotle and that’s the superiority theory. I personally don’t see this as separate. In the main, things are the funniest when we get to observe them from a distance. We’re the person who plays the prank and gets to watch to see how successful we’ve been.
One way not to argue in support of the Kantian transcendental aesthetic is the way Dinesh D'Souza does in What's So Great About Christianity. D'Souza draws an analogy with a tape recorder, which I discuss in this post and will not repeat here. The problem with the analogy, and similar analogies, is that it is undermined by the very transcendental aesthetic it is meant to support. If Kant is right, and we have access to appearances only and not the reality behind appearances, then we have no way of knowing what is really going on with whatever reality is behind the appearance we call "tape recorder." Whatever thing or things out there in reality give rise to the appearance of a tape recorder, we can't know what they are or are not capable of. They may be capable of all sorts of things we can't imagine; including access to reality in ways we cannot imagine.
Beauty with a conscience project is a growing awareness to battle climate change and to educate people on the impact of human consumption. This project will allow other companies to support our environment by giving at least one peso per sold item and they call it "Piso para sa KMBI" project.
Tap 126
JS - Does it actually say they have to meet four times per season?
Is this the right course of action? Some people think yes and others think no. I don’t know if that if Mary and those who came before had been told more about their situation if they’d have chosen a different path. There are times when she does put her own self interest aside for that of the community and times she doesn’t (I’m wary of being specific because of spoilers).
“He doesn’t want any Mr. Grandpa.” Swinging her feet under the table, Emily sucked the milk off her finger that she was swirling around in her milk. “Reese likes just the white kind of milk.”
The very activity of prisoners washing was a big concession, because before 1985 it was not even considered necessary for the prisoners to wash and they were infested with lice.
American History X
Night of Champions, Buffalo, New York. Christian has talked to Teddy Long, and HHH. They are self-absorbed to do the right thing, so he will do the right thing. Christian has been in this business for 17 years, he has had matches that have been unheard of, and because of that, he deserves one more match for the World Heavyweight Title. Whoever wins the Randy Orton Vs Mark Henry match, he deserves to face the winner immediately.
*Chakki Ben Chakki Ben* Lyrics
Please mention number #35 when emailing me about buying, as I have some similar ones
It’s a calendar poster, sitting above one of the work stations here at work. It just appeared there today, as if sent from above. Not from God, I mean from the loading dock.
71. The Bank Job
True blessings stem not from your own mind, but from the universe before you… Let the radiance of your youth guide you each and every step of the way. Go before God and let yourself shine, for thee are a powerful product of beauty and Grace as is Jesus the lord, amen.
Is it too solid to melt properly? Yeah - back to the drawing board. Add more Shea butter and oils and continue the testing until it meets your specs. Maybe nix the cocoa butter if you so rudely ignored me on that one. Rude.
6. Conan Obrien
When I was twelve, I couldn't imagine why the trees
Me: "Dooooooork. What should I write about?"
Here is the NIH info:
John Smith’s Grand National Record: 1992 Roc De Prince (17th); 2000 PAPILLON (WON), 2001 Papillon (4th), 2006 Jack High (UR
Romans: Genius - didn’t think they (the Daemon's) were clever; but magical, divine entity living in the walls like Dobby the house elf. Artists are protected from narcissism if successful, and not your fault if you fail. During the renaissance, this idea changed, and the creative process was returned to the individual. The pressure of being a genius instead of channeling genius was too immense, and has been killing off creativity ever since.
Subsidiary reasons of our failure to return are due to the sickness of
I could be opening up a big can of worms by speaking this publicly.
For the center piece, I used the squash looking pieces we painted ealier, pumpkins from Halloween (yes, they survived this long....I'm amazed too), the fake leaves, and a serving platter I already that just so happen to be orange. I just arranged them to have a outdoor fall scene look.
With all that is known about the potential for such a catastrophe, either through attack or through the normal, observable processes of the Sun, you would think that governments everywhere would be feverishly taking steps to harden critical systems. You would be wrong. Even in America where we have casually spent trillions of dollars on fruitless foreign wars in the last decade, the Congress cannot see its way to have the country embark on a program that might cost a couple hundred billion to guard against the known dangers of the Sun or even the unpredictable action of unfriendly nations (think: North Korea) that might use EMP to maximize the effect of their meager nuclear arsenals. In fact, the writer of the afterword to One Second After tells us: "A well-designed nuclear weapon detonated at a high altitude over Kansas could have damaging effects over virtually all of the continental United States."
Their secret longing Like a bolt out of the blue
Howard University Training School for Nurses opened in 1893 and the school transitioned to Freedman’s Hospital School of Nursing in 1894. The program proudly awarded nearly 2,000 diplomas before Congress transferred the nursing program back to Howard University in 1967. Currently the College of Nursing and Allied Health Services offers degree programs in nursing, clinical lab science, nutritional science, physician’s assistant, and physical therapy.
Would Hill have concocted an explanation for the non-materialization of the promised contracts, as he did for the Crown contracts the previous autumn, and encouraged his disappointed clients to remain hopeful? Was this the opening move in a more nefarious scheme? We’ll never know, because on September 14 the agency ceased to exist. Claire Ashton (whose prose style is also remarkably similar to Hill’s), initially claimed that Hill was “no longer with the agency,” but in later emails declared that the man calling himself Christopher Hill was an imposter whose activities weren’t sanctioned by the agency.
I’m doing these because I’m trying to get rid of those bits of skin that flop about whenever I raise my arms above a 45˚ angle. These are very inconvenient, because it means I can’t point properly at anything when I’m wearing a sleeveless dress without these fleshy flaps swaying in a distractingly unattractive way.
I just recorded an EP. Here is the link to download the EP: So Lazy. I may record an album next year. I am also acting in a movie where I play a songwriter/fictional version of myself. A few Oh My Melodies songs will make it into the movie.
So today I decided to make it for him, and DAMN it was delicious. I guess Rachael Ray knows what she's doing ;)
Things really picked up as Joshua and Amelia started to know each other more and more. Everything become more exciting yet twice as frustrating as Eli came into the picture. He's a ghost too and needless to say, the perfect villain. The events following had me hooked!
*uk Trolley = u.s. 'cart'.
Would you stop writing those down? You're annoying me!
Graham: if we rally around Mitt Romney
Yes, Mary is on a donkey. But she's holding the Baby in her arms. Not in her womb.
Frost the cupcakes with white frosting until the entire cake is fully covered.
One of these kids is not like the other...bonus kindness points to the person who's willing to push this Home Depot cart back to its home! See Home Depot in the far, far background of the picture?
This vintage Granny Apple green pitcher and bowl set has not see the light of day in years. I found her tucked waaay back in a corner of a barn at a yard sale. Covered in grime ~ you almost couldn't see her fabulous color. She is just what my Mother's Day roses needed.
Add to this the fact that we begin to learn throughout the latter half of the book that there's more to Cale than we thought at first. His powers and skills are slowly revealed especially as he takes on bullies and others whom Cale makes as enemies.
When I walk out the door of my apartment building, turn right, and walk a couple of blocks, I see in front of me the only building that remains standing from the 1893 Columbian World’s Exposition: the Museum of Science and Industry, which is housed in what was the Palace of Fine Arts.
Gopalswamy and his team studied the Sun’s shifting magnetic field from microwave signatures obtained by Japanese radio telescopes and reported their findings in a paper in the Astrophysical Journal on April 9.
On Saturday I was back on my bike, starting my training for another charity ride (you'll hear more about that in another post). I was looking forward to that lane; indeed, as I approached it I was thinking how, when passing through much of the middle of England, it was the hedgerows I'd liked best. Throughout the ride, there'd been pretty much a direct correlation between bushes and birdsong - I remember commenting as much to one of my colleagues.
As you walk along the muddy path, surrounded by towering trees all smothered with their hanging gardens of bromeliads and ferns, an insistent buzzy screech begins to build up around you. The noise increases, building up to a wall of sound that completely engulfs you as it reaches its nearly deafening crescendo. The sound vibrates every cell of your body until, suddenly, all the cicadas stop their screaming and the jungle returns to its relative peace. Now the only humming that you can hear is the softer, more peaceful hum of a humming bird as it whizzes right past your ear and up into the canopy. In the cloud forest, the mist gently caresses your skin, clinging to your hair and eyelashes, slowly permeating your clothing to cool your skin. In the lowland rainforests, the moisture comes from within, as sweat oozes through all of your pores, drenching your clothing, which clings and sticks uncomfortably to your body. Water is the life giving force of these forests. At times the rain thunders down on the canopy, crashing through the leaves and down to the forest floor. Once the rain has finished, the dripping has just begun, as the water makes it way, drip by drip from a million leaves, percolating its way through all the layers of the jungle until it reaches the leaf litter below. The jungle is never quiet.
5. Sheamus beat Daniel Bryan 2 falls to 1 to retain the Smackdown title 7/10
But don’t take our word for it!
Love you all, and thanks for your support.
“The new design, all lines pulled back, excesses eliminated and curves chiseled to perfection, synergises with a high performance powertrain to look dynamic,” as per the statement issued by the company.
But now? I don't let people in. If you have a friend who, when you pick her up, she meets you outside her door, or if you bring something by, she meets you at the door and doesn't let you in? More than likely, she's messy. And ashamed.
patellae
Then came the fun part. Using a special tip that has multiple holes, I covered the top of the cake by piping on "grass". And then I piped on a "grass" border on the bottom of the cake as well.
Though I may be young
Last week we mentioned that we were going to redo our living room, so we wanted to share an update with you! Once again the house looks like a small war was fought in it with small paths dug through the knee deep wreckage. Holes line the walls and a fine layer of rubble covers the floor. What a mess. However, there IS progress! Lets look at what we started with! Living room 0.5:
This is an evening dedicated to business owners and leaders in and around Surrey, offering them a chance to meet, have great conversations and make positive connections. We have over 50 businesses booked to join us already.
Lust For Life blogger Mary attended the letter writing social at the U.S. Postal Museum in Washington, D.C., and she has fascinating photos and stories to share!
I love you, my little brother!
In pole position (15)
Here is another birthday card that will make you feel a queen for a day. I used the curly punch and did a bit of shadowing using the Baja Breeze c/s behind. I added the Itty Bitty Punch shape punch
Most likely my next project, opening in three weeks as part of a group textile show. It involves a performance aspect performed by a couple of dancers from the local strip club as well as a hand embroidered element, the action however will no doubt have interesting consequences, good or bad depends on the audience.
Then I realized that lots of parenting experts talk about how important it is to be firm with one's children. I never liked that idea, and now I have figured out how to explain why. When you are firm, you only have two choices: to hold yourself together against any pressure your kids might apply, or to give in and break under the pressure. You have two positions: unbroken and broken. No one wants to think of being broken by her children, so one might think she must be rigid to stay together. The firm parent must deflect any pressure to yield, to give in, to change her mind.
Oh Avacyn Restored is just around the corner and I have a very special brew for next time…
Look for MediaWatch every Saturday in guelphspeaks.ca.
Did you make a Post to share/Blog/etc? – 3 Extra Entries for every Post you make.
Paramount's association with comedy goes back to the earliest days of the company. It was in 1916 that the company made Roscoe "Fatty" Arbuckle the then unprecedented offer of $1000 a day and complete creative control. Mr. Arbuckle formed his own company, Comique, with Joseph Schenck to produce short subjects that would be distributed by Paramount. This arrangement would prove so successful that Fatty Arbuckle would graduate to making feature films at Famous Players-Lasky Corporation. His features at Famous Players-Lasky Corporation included the second screen adaptation of Brewster's Millions (1921), The Dollar a Year Man (1921), The Travelling Salesman (1921), and others. Roscoe Arbuckle's feature films at Famous Players-Lasky Corporation were very successful. Unfortunately, Mr. Arbuckle's career as an actor would be all but ended by the infamous scandal involving the death of aspiring actress Virginia Rappe.
Clark goes on to admit something kind of embarrassing about the grading system:
With our star slipping this season the youngsters sound like they know what it takes. Here’s Nico Yennaris in a recent interview:
Like always, I use a few yards of faux silk as my tree skirt. I just throw it under there and fluff:
(April 30) Strong winds and heavy rain have brought down trees and power lines across England and Wales, leaving thousands without power. (Source)
To coax the tangible results into shared reception
Along with Cape Cod Bay and a channel east of Nantucket Island, the Bay of Fundy — a part of the Gulf of Maine between New Brunswick and Nova Scotia — is one of the right whale’s major feeding areas. It is also the preferred feeding ground for nursing and reproductively active females.
Computer and FAX Eavesdropping Transmitters
Seven days to pay the rec bill (WHAT did he spend it on?),
However, my summer resolution is to actually begin writing again, so look for me back at the end of June and beginning of July.
Stand with your hands by your side.
Below is a Lobby Card for "The Breaking Point" which was a remake of "To Have and Have Not" but apparently more faithful to the original Hemingway story. Co-star Patricia Neal was on TCM talking about this film...I guess Garfield was discussing her character with her and he says "You know...you're a whore...know what I mean?" laughing she says "Yeah i knew what he meant!". Directed by Michael Curtiz and with a great supporting cast, I recommend this film highly!
Two things stand out here. First, the notion that any sane individual can be “guilty” of something, but be unconscious thereof is a rather odd idea to find in Britain (but not in the former Soviet Union or communist China). Second, note the emphasis on there being a distinction between ‘the institution or organisation’ and ‘the individuals within the service’. Nothing, however, is said about the minimum number of individuals in the ‘system’ which constitutes a crossing of the threshold from ‘individual racism’ to ‘institutional racism’. So when those who use ‘institutional racism’ maintain that they are not targeting ‘individuals’ but then go on to accuse the ‘system’, without providing numerical data, they are, in the absence of such data or definition, withdrawing their concession that ‘we are not talking about individuals.’ This absence of clarity means that the anti-racists can have it both ways. If it suits their various agendas, the remarks of one individual will be taken as prima facie evidence of “institutional racism”, and thus as justification for wholesale purging of the particular institution (police force, universities, schools, armed forces and so on). And are members of the MPS Black Police Association - a black-only organisation - exempt from accusations of institutional racism in the way they police the majority white population? And if yes, why? And why have the Commission for Racial Equality (CRE) and the Equal Opportunities Commission (EOC) maintained such a deafening silence about black-only organisations when any white organisation that closed its doors to blacks, even were it do so on grounds of free association, would be hounded mercilessly?
o National Council of Architectural Registration Boards
there is still … help
Sessions
Many of those who became followers of Srila Prabhupada in the 1960′s had connections to the counterculture movement. The counterculture comprised not only the hippies, but also the beatniks who preceded them, the yippies, and the anti-war peaceniks. The Krsna Consciousness movement was comprised of elements that were a common denominator amongst all these groups: sharing love and food, chanting, dancing, advocating peace and self-realization, and delving into the mysteries of the ancient eastern arts.
Performed by: Adele
The biggest problem with this query is lack of specificity. I don't understand how any of the science works, I don't have a clue about the society Mia suddenly finds herself in, and although I feel like I have a sense of the struggle the slaves must go through, I have almost no concept of who they're fighting against.
You can also declutter office and car with this method.
We start to lose hope.
I had my yearly appointment ten days ago and was assured that DH's SA was pretty good overall. Morph was low, but the sheer quantity more than makes up for it. She said specifically that if we had come to her with these results and the desire to prevent pregnancy, she would immediately put me on the pill. That was good to hear, and has calmed us both down a lot.
A lot of people say a good cover will sell a book. I’m not sure about that, but a good cover will certainly attract the customer and a bad cover will put people off. It can be seen as a reflection of the content. I know I have been swayed by that in the past. For roughly the same price as an editor, probably less, you can get some great cover artwork created at a professional resolution ready for print.
Matt Zwolinski at Bleeding Heart Libertarians does a good job putting it all in perspective. He goes point by point, and I won't reprint them here, but there is context behind the raw numbers that includes changing factors like household size, education, and immigration.
“An uprising is coming to South Africa and the uprising will not be against the ANC,” he said to screaming and cheering ANC members.
Why hello again, it's been a while hasn't it? If you follow me on Twitter you'll understand my lengthy absence from blogging, Kris and I just made the leap into home ownership. Hurray! The journey has been maddening, stressful and, in places, downright miserable but all of that now seems like a distant memory. Well, if you ignore the fact I've been without a fridge freezer for three weeks of course.
Whether you're a blogger, journalist or a fiction writer, you'll have to deal with the dreaded phenomena of "writer's block" at least once in your career. There are some simple ways to find that inspiration you need to remove the road blocks and continue (or start) writing. To learn the five easy ways to find inspiration, continue reading below.
A little bit of sewing around the edge of the card, a little bit of faux stitching around the critters and the card is done. Just need to give it to my crab-ulous friend!
The 18Broadway garden uses bio-filtration to reduce pollutants in the storm water that is captured from the surrounding streets and parking lots. The storm water flows into a series of channels which line the perimeter of the garden on two sides. Planted within these channels are a myriad of alluring plants which filter out pollutants, and add a pleasing aesthetic to the garden space. This system is designed to retain 100% of the initial downpour of rainfalls. Gravity directs the storm water downhill through the channels and eventually into two 20,000-gallon underground cisterns which store the clean water. Once the clean water is captured in the cisterns, it is UV treated and then pumped back up to be used as needed for irrigation in the garden. This sounds pretty good so far, but... like the infomercials say, "wait, there's more!"
LL: The title came from a song on the album and the lyrics came from the way I was feeling when I wrote the song. I’ve often been asked what I think about when I write but I don’t really know myself. I’m not thinking of a specific person or experience, it’s a mixture of a lot of things.
4. After you gather all the skins and return them to the Mystic, s/he will give you the Shadow Medallion. What that does is when equipped, your attack power will increase! Originally it was 15% but apparently can give 50% now. In the past, it was also only for Pilgrims, Wizards, Goofs, and Sages, but an update at the time of this post was made so all classes could wear. There's an upgrade of this medallion in the Sky Tower as well.
Do you have a specific writing style?
As well as this Adam has been a blessing to several charities, has produced many films and music videos and leaves behind a beautiful wife and daughter.
I've been thinking this week about Elk Camp since my extended family has been there the past few weeks. This is a two to three week camping trip out in the woods in northern Arizona. Those who want (my dad, uncle, brother-in-law, etc) apply to a state drawing to get to do an archery hunt for elk. We have gone in the past but did not go this year since Zack is in school now. It's quite an experience! you can read about the last time we went here.
If you're pissed off about this, please share this information. Maybe one day we'll all get it together and make the MTA answerable to the Mayor or the Govenor (jeez can you imagine) somebody who could be made to run the MTA better.
Keith sensed he had to tread carefully now. “So you—she— she’s dead?”
Venus conjuncts Pluto in Capricorn December 1, giving us a further energetic reminder of just how nose-to-the-relationship-grindstone we need to be, kicking up distortion in any relational areas that require more laser-sharp awareness and honing from us.
If lux and feminine is your taste, they have many stunning options for adorning yourself – the Fringe Necklace is young and glam, as is the Lafayette Cross Body Bag, the Toujours Earrings, and the Chantilly Lace Cuff. All great choices…
A few summers ago, I actually picked up two of these disturbing elves (you know you have the real ones when their eyes look sideways) at a yardsale. I wanted my kids to see what passed as acceptable holiday decorations when I was a kid.
The market needs to be fulfilled and the market will be fulfilled, by the first viable product that comes along.
Day four: your parents
Our second visitor this week was Austin Jones, a young man who has a passion for antique fruit tree varieties. He's been running a trial of about 100 heirloom fruit varieties at Bear Creek Farm (which I've written about before here - they're the ones doing the experiments with acres and acres of grafted tomatoes). He works there on their 11 acre produce garden. They sell to Whole Foods in Kansas City and at area farmers markets.
This led us to discuss wine spritzers – often in the heat of summer an entire bottle of wine can be a little too strong on a hot summer afternoon, I tend to drink fast if it’s hot (don’t know about you?). If you freshen it up with sparkling water you can still get a pretty good wine buzz going while maintaining smart and witty conversation. We like to be high class Wine Hos you know.
My favorite, though, is when I have no critical points to make. When I can read and enjoy a book without thinking, "a kid that age would NOT do that," or "too many details...boring me to death," or other negative things.
It also can not be denied that, although as a people we, native Europeans, have faced war, famine pestilence and catastrophe we have never before come so close to our own annihilation.
Iran and Brazil developed strong links during the Lula’s presidency, who in 2010 helped with the Turkish Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan to reach an agreement for the exchange of nuclear fuel between Tehran and the West which was later denied by the US and its western allies.
“And now, Israel, what does the LORD your God require of you? He requires you to fear him, to live according to his will, to love and worship him with all your heart and soul, 13and to obey the LORD’s commands and laws that I am giving you today for your own good. 14 The highest heavens and the earth and everything in it all belong to the LORD your God. 15Yet the LORD chose your ancestors as the objects of his love. And he chose you, their descendants, above every other nation, as is evident today. 16 Therefore, cleanse your sinful hearts and stop being stubborn.
you have no idea.
The list includes Dell Inc., Honeywell International Inc, Nike Inc, Patagonia, BMW Bayerische Motoren Werke AG, Johnson Controls Inc and HSBC Holdings PLC, Best Buy Co Inc and T-Mobile International AG & Co KG, General Electric Co, American Express Co, PepsiCo Inc, McDonald’s Corp, Starbucks Corp, IKEA AB…
9 His Dark Materials – Philip Pullman*
But I just couldn’t brake my spinning rear.
make us laugh
White trash lunch.
This song has been doing the rounds for a while, in fact it’s been playing on a playlist I subscribe to on Spotify for a couple of weeks now and every time it was on I found myself stopping whatever I was doing to find out what’s playing.
Now let's talk photo cards. I love the idea because you are able to send your friends and family a little bit of yourself in the mail - in the form of a photograph. I feel like it's a more personal way to send some Christmas cheer. And your hands will thank you too.
Picture #1: 5 to 6 strawberries, sprinkle one package of Sweet n low
I’m back from a hiatus initiated by a broken arm. I actually enjoyed the period of rest I was treated to by my “unfortunate” circumstance of riding a Segway down to the earth – sideways – on a tour of the Botanical Gardens! Aside from costing a lot of people (insurance, myself, etc.) a lot of money, though, my broken arm experience has been amazingly helpful to me! But this is not about that.
Day one of back-to-life 2011: Looking pretty good so far.
For today, that's all I got! everything is happening the way that I want it to and not by chance, I decided that beat the path into the ground where my feet will fall.
Taranaki 3.8% to 4.8% (2,300 to 2,900)
I'm so sorry to be asking all of the blogging world for help again when you were all so generous with your donations for the bush fires which devastated parts of my State- Victoria, almost 2 years ago. Then I asked for donations of QAYG blocks so I could make and donate quilts to the people who lost their homes, family and friends in the fires.
the warmth of my netbook,
It is elementary school arithmetic. The Greek debt-to-GDP is currently at 140%. It will be close to 180% by year’s end (assuming someone gives them the money). The deficit is north of 15%. They simply cannot afford to make the interest payments. True market (not Eurozone-subsidized) interest rates on Greek short-term debt are close to 100%, as I read the press. Their long-term debt simply cannot be refinanced without Eurozone bailouts. #7 The austerity measures that have already been implemented are causing the Greek economy to shrink rapidly. Greek Finance Minister Evangelos Venizelos has announced that the Greek government is now projecting that the economy will shrink by 5.3% in 2011.
I think he also wore one of those change machines on his belt too, it was silver and had these different cylinders for pennies, nickels, quarters and dimes.
A wind comes off a frozen peak,
What really got my attention was the calibre of Christmas Carols on rotation. Apart from the traditional carols there were the country carols. Now I know that country music has a reputation for sometimes being morose, but these were something else. There were two in particular that somewhat floored me.
The New York 10K is my experience with them. NYRR (New York Road Runners) seemingly has a lock on Central Park, and so RnR did a 10K to come into the market. In wanting to support something to provide choice, I figured I’d do it, so I signed up. It was expensive for a 10K – I want to say $60 or $70 – but it did have bling, and it was inaugural.
Please PRAY for Stan Butler @
This leads me to believe that it is a lack of oxygen or blood flow to my brain. But what causes the optical illusion of small particles of light flying around? And is this lack of oxygen or blood flow also the reason for people who report seeing a “bright white light” when they almost die?
Next, there are some local families who have joined us on this adoption journey. The Morton family is bringing home Sam and Duncan. Two 15 year old boys who are close to aging out of the system and becoming unavailable for adoption. They have a serious time crunch. They will most likely travel in June and need thousands of dollars to bring the boys home. They have an 8GB iPod Touch Giveaway happening. We've talked here before about how unlikely it is for older children and boys to be chosen, so the Morton family choosing Sam and Duncan is amazing. Let's rally for them and help bring these boys home.
We gave them some cups, and they played for hours. We had to keep filling the pool up because they were dumping all the water out, but other than that it accomplished the goal. They stayed cool and were having fun. We spent all afternoon outside and it was much needed.
Leaders have even used the verse from Acts 4:12, where the early church gave to everyone as they had need, to promote their actions. They now want to take from the wealthy and "redistribute the wealth" to the poor.
Overall, our weekend in Prague was simply amazing, and if you are planning a trip to Europe, make sure to visit this breathtaking city!! :)
4 Badlands
Tommyknocker Brewery Pick Axe Pale Ale
- Gosford Council appoints mediator to negotiate purchase of blocks along Bambara Rd
This pen symbolizes Asia’s appreciation of balanced harmony and the complementary yet opposing forces of the Yin and Yang (two balanced yet opposing aspects of any one phenomenon). The pen is symmetrical and was designed not only as a beautiful object but also one of improved stability. The body's center of gravity makes it very ergonomic to write with. In addition, a special silicon rubber was adopted for both the grip and cap area to improve the durability of this pen. Pen features a rolling ring in the middle that can scroll through all 26 letters of the alphabet so that you can personalize the pen with your initial. Six body colors are available including aqua blue, cherry pink, happy pink, mint green, snow white and vitamin orange. Don't forget to be environmentally friendly and buy refills! Each pen writes in black ink, but black, green, blue, pink, and red ink refills are also available.
This is a photo of Gabriel when he was a wee little lad. This image is from the first night I brought him home almost 8 years ago. Look at how cute he was. I fell in love with him immediately when I saw him as a cute little marshmallow ball beating up his siblings. He was so tiny & so cute. He grew up to be a big fluffy fellow and the bestest friend I could ever have asked for.
Junsu had tears in his eyes when say this. Yoochun smile and get on the bed and hug Junsu, plant a kiss on his lips. Junsu flinch a bit make Yoochun worry.
For the first time, I went to a very dark place about it and I finally get it.
This was an incredibly fun project that I was inspired to take on a few months ago (See this post). Now I am the proud owner of my new console table and best of all, it was a fraction of the cost of buying one!
Ivan Avalos, who works in the framing shop at the back of neighboring Paper Vision, said he saw Collins Monday morning.
What happened to the promises in front of God at St. Paul's Cathedral?
Bartimaeus
For example. You would never see the Los Angeles Lakers, New York Yankees, or New England Patriots have a successful campaign and then come back the following season and hire the equivalent of an intern to guide them through the next season. But it would appear that this is exactly what Veronica Campbell Brown (VCB) is going to do!
I don’t know if I’m being too touchy, but I hate to think of someone being bullied, let alone being bullied on the scale of having a video of them posted on YouTube for millions to see and laugh at.
Who can forget 1975? Greatness, sweetness, the greatest back to ever play was draft by the Bears, Walter Payton. Payton rushed for over 16,000 yards in his Hall of Fame career.
Hello everyone!
Does this make sense to anyone else? Am I just talking out of my ass because I (gasp!) am childless and this makes it obviously easier for me to assign these kinds of loosely bound "rules" to the whole concept?
That night he’s in her yard. He’s got his green dufflebag with all his paints and all his paintbrushes and a fine linen canvas. He’d just shouldered the bag onto the lawn when a flash blinds him. She’s in the window with a Polaroid.
Anyway, you ALL need to go check it out. They just got it started, but they already have items up to view. Christmas is just around the corner if you need a great gift idea : )
I remember watching Johnny Crawford on "The Rifleman" when I was a little girl. It was one of the TV shows that my father and I would watch together. I had a big crush on Chuck Connors, and really didn't pay much attention to Johnny. Other than this show, I never saw Johnny in anything else, and I don't remember ever hearing his big hit, "Cindy's Birthday", on the radio. I never even knew that he was a Mouseketeer until sometime in the 1990s, when I went to a vintage toy show and he was there signing autographs. Of course, I stopped by and got an autographed pic and talked to him a little bit (by then, I was into collecting the vintage LPs, and trying to find those in the "celebrity vocals" category). That's when I found out that he was now the leader of a big band orchestra. Now, I just love Johnny and love watching him on reruns of "The Rifleman", which are being aired on AMC and the Encore Westerns channels. The title of this album was also the title of one of the episodes of "The Rifleman", and features "Cindy's Birthday", which I hear pretty regularly now on a local "music legends" radio station. I cleaned it up as much as I could, but there are still clicks and pops, and some skips. (If anyone has a better rip, please do share!) Enjoy!
Just after the turn to the 21st century I saw a vision of a web of light energy spread over the earth as seen from above the atmosphere. There were brilliant centers of light that pulsated with life and weaker fainter spots connected with less vibrant threads. I sensed the brighter lights were light workers and their prayers and energy would ignite the fainter lights resulting in a brilliant net of light energy overlaying the earth like an intricately woven spider web or lace shawl. Today, I ask each of you to connect your light with the Net of Light as The Grandmothers instruct with prayer and love to help heal and balance the earth and all our relations. As the Hopi Elders said, "Now is the time, and we are the ones we have been waiting for."
I started by stamping one of the stem images in green ink, then added a flower in bright yellow ink at the top of each stem. I die cut a strip of green cardstock with CSS’s grass die, then stamped the die cut piece with the matching image before setting it on the bottom of the panel. The clouds were created with some distress ink and a cloud template.
Then there’s Jack Black. He’s a talent that needs a very precise kind of surrounding to be good, or else he’s just plain bad, or even worse he gets to be super annoying. Mr. Linklater of course is the man responsible for having given Mr. Black the film that suits all of his talents, comical and musical, the very best in 2003′s School of Rock, and here he’s at it again, somehow knowing that Mr. Black would be the perfect Bernie; and trust me when I tell you we’ve seen nothing like this from Jack Black before. He just erases any sort of conception you may have had about Jack Black previously and creates this character out of the blue ever so perfectly, showing us a new side to himself that he probably didn’t even knew was in him. It’s a truly brilliant performance.
I decided right then and there that my presence in that cottage might only stir up some sort of uninvited violence, so I took a walk.
This is almost, but not quite, a normal way for a Mormon boy in Utah to grow up in the mid-late 1980s and early 1990s when I was there. I mean, I'll bet there were plenty of Mormon boys around me whose imaginations were best unlocked by the scriptures and their bikes, but I'll also bet they were thinking about Nephi instead of Elijah, and about wearing cowboy hats instead of turbans. The difference is pretty subtle, I think, but somehow has meant a lot to me. I'm still, in many senses, an untypically typical Mormon boy.
LONDON, June 19 (Reuters) – British peace campaigner Brian Haw, who lived and slept outside the Houses of Parliament in London for a decade to protest against the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan, has died of cancer, his family said on Sunday. He was 62.
I finally know who killed Amanda Palmer: Amanda did it, with the Twitter, on the internets. Can we open the Clue envelope now please, and move on to other artists? Like Emilie Autumn, perhaps?
I just followed the recipe given by Aipi,s blog US Masala ,so not going to post it again .Please visit her blog for the recipe,she has an amazing collection of recipes in her space.
For the contest, I thought I would just run it the same way as the Shabby Apple contest back in December. If you would like to enter, go to the Sourpuss Clothing website, www.sourpussclothing.com, and pick out your favorite item. Come back here and comment about what you covet from the site. I will post first thing Thursday morning who won and ask for your address to mail the bags, so be sure to come back then and see if you are the winner just in case you need this for your trip to the biggest weekender in the country!
Yeah, I know that Texas got beat today by stupid ol' O.U. But you know what? U.T. is still way cooler than O.U. simply based on these two facts: It's not in Oklahoma AND it's actually in Austin, which--as many of us know--flippin' rules.
* Schedule / coordinate mover for early June - get house and personal items organized.
What do you think? Is there an ideal balance between specialism and individuality on a blog? What's your experience about the line you draw between your public written life and your private one? I am curious if the people reading my blog have extra things they would like to find out about me and my not-writing-life (such as it is)
This is the sixth in a series of excerpts from our book, Be a Person: the Social Media Operating Manual for Enterprises. The book (itself part of a series for different audiences), is available in paper form at http://bit.ly/OrderBeAPerson save $5 using Coupon Code 62YTRFCV
Born on December 18, 1984, Katie Walsh comes from a family steeped in racing heritage as her father is the trainer, broadcaster and former champion amateur jockey Ted Walsh while her brother is Ruby Walsh, the most successful jockey ever at the Cheltenham Festival who has twice ridden the winner of the John Smith’s Grand National. Katie led up the 2000 winner Papillon, who was trained by her father and ridden by Ruby. Along with her sister-in-law, Nina Carberry (who is married to her brother Ted Jnr), she is one of the best ever female jockeys. The amateur’s first victory came on Hannon, trained by her father, in a Flat race at Gowran Park on October 10, 2003. From an early stage in her career, she forged a successful relationship with champion Irish jump trainer Willie Mullins and her first big victory came on the Mullins-trained Glencove Marina in the 2006 Goffs Land Rover Bumper at the Punchestown Festival. During the early part of her career, Walsh enjoyed significant success on the Flat, winning the Ladies’ Derby at the Curragh on Cloneden in 2005 and partnering her father’s Collingwood to two victories on the beach at Laytown in 2006 and 2007. Never Compromise gave Walsh back-to-back victories in the Risk Of Thunder Chase over the banks course at Punchestown in 2006 and 2007. The 2010 Cheltenham Festival saw Walsh partner two winners, taking the National Hunt Chase on the Ferdy Murphy-trained Poker De Sivola and the Vincent O’Brien County Hurdle on Thousand Stars for Willie Mullins. Thousand Stars also provided Walsh with victory in the Grade One John Smith’s Aintree Hurdle in 2011. She came in for the ride on Seabass following her brother’s decision to partner On His Own. Walsh lives with her long-term boyfriend Ross O’Sullivan, a point-to-point trainer. Dick and Lewis Rees, successful in 1921 and 1922, were the last siblings to both ride Grand National winners.
Seyfarth IP Team Scores an Unprecedented Victory for Home Shopping Network in Patent Infringement Suit
Elsewhere, NOWHERE’s elite force of teenage metahumans, the Ravagers, lead by Rose Wilson, captured a team of time-displaced teens from the Legion of Superheroes. Now the Teen Titans, Superboy, and the Legion Lost must work together in order to survive the Culling – or face death at the hands of the Ravagers.
America, All of Our Institutions Are Decaying – Commies in 2012? Santorum “This Man” ad 2012 Rick Santorum Mitt Romney Attack Ad “Rombo” HD WITH Poopy Farts! Thursday Night Chuckles: Daily Show-Jon Stewart: GOP Pivots & South Korea’s Dud RID THE CONGRESS OF INCUMBENT REPUBLICAN SENATORS…THEY ARE NOT FAIR! Mitt Romney: ‘Not the hair!!!’ America, All of Our Institutions Are Decaying – Commies in 2012? Clinton: Romney flip-flops will doom him RMS: Arizona Law and MItt Romney Will Speak at Anti-Gay Liberty University May 12th Tax Returns & Other Financial Records Make Known Romney’s Anti-Gay Funding Romney Would Be a Different President Everyday. NO CORE per Santorum!
In any case, this will be a super short post with just a few pictures, since it’s the last day and we spent the whole day in Shibuya doing last min shopping and exploring.
They playing political tennis with our National Security.
I must admit, I was a bit apprehensive about using it in my cooking. But you have to start somewhere right? So I decided to give it a go. I picked up their summer special Quorn Sizzling Bangers and decided on the Sausages and mash with gravy and green peas recipe from the Quorn website (which btw has a tonne of easy recipes and is worth checking out). Cooking is fairly straightforward, with clear cut instructions and the outcome was also fairly decent. I however found a distinct flavour difference as opposed to the husband who said it was good. I mean you would obviously know its not the sausage you are used to, but it could easily pass for one when had with the mash and gravy. I also picked up the Quorn mince after that to make some kheema masala and that I must say was a winner. I guess its the fact that its mince and the masala catches on pretty well, which completely masked the fact that it wasn't meat. So considering all this, I guess it is a good option when you want to impress those finicky vegetarian guests at home. I would however stick to chicken style strips and mince meat as opposed to the ready meals in the future.
W. Bradford Wilcox, a sociologist at the University of Virginia, said such policies suggested ‘marriage is not as fundamental to society’ as it once was.
As the result of a laid back attitude, we are told of stories where a pensioner received RM21,433 a month instead of RM214.33 for 16 months! The mistake was detected after more than a year.
It was Twitter’s birthday on Wednesday, and with about 290 million tweets being exchanged each day, someone in the Twittersphere must know something about a song that causes dry eyes, I thought.
But even though I didn’t run, I got to take part in another kind of race–a race against time. Final grades were due by 2:30 today, and I finished with five minutes to spare. Also, my semester of grad school is ending soon, so tonight I started work on the final project for one class, and now I’ve got to keep working on the other assignment for the other class. I’ve got so much anxiety over these things that I’ve had terrible heartburn for the last couple days. A slight amount of anxiety can be an effective motivator for me, but this is crippling. I’m so close, yet so very far. I apologize for going on about something that doesn’t seem relevant to this blog’s purposes, but it kinda relates, because this is another reason why I need to run! It’s the best stress-reliever there is.
# Kiss a guy who you otherwise simply despise.
I'd heard rumors about reputable bar and design talent either potentially, marginally, temporarily or fully involved in le Pompon for some time before its opening a few months ago. So, I was looking forward to checking up on it with Matt, Vio and Kim.
If nothing’s ventured nothing’s gained
-state and city governments that have been trying to ‘make do’ for years seeing visions of bankruptcy
Perhaps the most interesting aspect of this story is with regard to Will and Elliott, two young men with varying levels of interest in Araby. The synopsis has us believing we’ll find ourselves in the middle of a love triangle, and while that is partly true, the dynamics of their individual relationships are so deliciously fascinating that we can’t quite work up an appropriate level of irritation over a commonly used young adult fiction plot device. Ms. Griffin shows a true talent for creating both physical and emotional masks in this tale, with the physical obscuring facial features and making it difficult for Araby (and us) to decipher intent and sincerity, but more intriguing are the various emotional masks each boy dons. We think we have things figured out, confident in our knowledge of which boy is better suited to Araby, but we soon find ourselves embroiled in a shell game–masks sliding on and off the boys’ faces so quickly we can barely keep track of the one we think is the real one, and all the while we are completely absorbed by Ms. Griffin’s sleight of hand and the web of deception it creates.
I hate the feeling - it's just this sick feeling in the pit of my stomach. There was NO reason to feel it today - none. It was clear, I think, there was no danger. I could see them for most of the time. It reminds me of the time Elie went running off (Don't you trust me?) except at least then I could explain that there might have been a reason to be upset.
During the five month hand rearing period the mamas and Kali stayed in an empty orangutan stall inside the orangutan building right next to the stall that Jill, the experience mother orangutan was in. She had to be held and cared for 24/7 so the mama would bring in bedding and make a "nest" at night and sleep with Kali.
There is a series of though rushing through my tiny egg like head as I am thinking this, I quickly settle on that ; high ambitions usually settle for far less, and that in the end ; it is the intentions and the process that counts.
We celebrated over 3 different days and we were so happy so many people wanted to celebrate with our sweet little Ava.
CHD’s can be detected by Echocardiogram, Cardiac catheterization, Chest X-Ray, Electrocardiogram (ECG/EKG), Magnetic Resonance Imaging (MRI) or other diagnostic testing. Newborns do not routinely have any of these exams. Some CHDs can be detected pre-birth by a Level II ultrasound or by a fetal echocardiogram.
A couple years ago, Built To Spill bassist Brett Nelson launched the Electronic Anthology Project, a passion project that reimagined Built To Spill’s songs through the aesthetic of New Wave bands like Talk Talk and Men Without Hats. The record contained all new vocal tracks from Built To Spill frontman Doug Martsch. Now, The Electronic Anthology Project of Dinosaur Jr., a collection of reinterpreted Dinosaur Jr. tracks, and yeah, Nelson got J. Mascis to record some new vox for that, too. This Nelson fellow is a go-getter, seems like. We’ve got the full thing, which features new versions of tracks like “Little Fury Things” and “Feel The Pain,” streaming below.
Oh well, I had to brave the elements anyway.
I've been a bad, bad blogger! In my rush to get this rental finished, I've neglected to take pictures! Shame on me. Did I mention this house I'm working on is two hours away and the only time I can work there on site is weekends?! So, I do my regular stuff & planning all week, then hop in the car and take off to work on the weekends when hubby and grandma can watch kids! Can you say pooped - tired - exhausted? Even so, I am very grateful for a job I enjoy so much:)
#9. Angelo Taylor – “Been there, done that!”
This terrible continuing cry lasted for 20 or 30 minutes, gradually dying away, as one after another could no longer withstand the cold and exposure. Practically no one was drowned, as no water was found in the lungs of those later recovered. Everyone had on a life preserver.
So intead of a pipe and a box, there is a cylindrical stone building with a dome. Inside one steps onto a double staircase that curves around the pool of water under the lantern of the dome. It is splendid and beautiful.
As brief as I can put it, there’s a Mayan Calendar which predicts the end of the world on December 21st, 2012 (this year), or as the put it, a day with a universal catastrophe.
Over the years, I’ve learned that there are actually two types of data dictionaries used. The first one is known as the passive data dictionary and it requires someone to manually update it. The second one is known as the active data dictionary and it is automatically updated by the DBMS. Every time the database changes, the active data dictionary is refreshed and updated at the same time.
Answer below!
No, I don't think a person off the street would ever wake up one day and say they wanted to do all of this, but I definitely had motives, as in I still had so many questions that came from having Preeclampsia/HELLP and the desire to know that I was now considered ok enough to try to conceive myself, or ok enough in that I didn't have any lasting damage to my heart, liver, kidney or uterus, arteries, or something else!
It makes me feel quite giddy but then I come back down to earth with a bump – I don’t actually have a Kindle and will have to hope that the cover of this well hyped book is very discreet or I’ll just have to do what I did as a teenager – and get a bigger book to hide it!
Please bring strong adhesive (Beacon is recommended-available at the
1/4 cup shortening (I use butter flavored Crisco)
Favorite quote from book:
Cyber shopping on Black Friday can be very appealing – no lining up at midnight, no line ups at all, no risk of being trampled by unruly crowds, shop in your PJs if you like, “shopping around” and comparing prices is a snap, and the list of benefits goes on.
Update: contrary to what I said earlier, you will not be expected to know the vocabulary words for this quiz. You will need to know them for the test.
In order to pick the best background for your product, you have to first do what I'm always telling you to do- know your market! Figure out who's most likely to buy your goods and market them accordingly. This of course may change over time, but as an example, in all the styles I've gone through there's a strong theme of romance, because I make romantic jewelry. Even if your jewelery doesn't look particularly 'of a style', you can still make it so- from coloured enamel beads to one of a kind vintage assemblage. Here's a pair of earrings I made in as modern a way as I can manage:
This is the cover for which Mrs. Brown wrote to Blackie asking if the cover device could be explained.
First spray paint yo shadow box to the color of your preference. Tape, who needs tape! I'm mothaf*ckin' gangster. I follow NO rules.
And I want to thank everybody that donated to the American Cancer Society in my name. I made 95% of my goal prior to the race. It's one of the reasons that I ran with a screwed-up foot.
I'm looking forward to this challenge and seeing how well I can stick to it! Especially with my current pregnancy and making sure I don't always give into temptation. Like today, when I just HAD to have a milkshake, so I loaded both kids into the car and drove to Steak 'N Shake and arrived two minutes after Happy Hour. I begged the guy to give me the Happy Hour deal (because otherwise I would have left) and thankfully, he did. Then I was bummed because my shake didn't taste nearly as great as I thought it would in my head.
Apparently, a human fetus is grown in an artificial environment, and without the pressure of the womb, it retains fetal proportions and features – including the large eyes, big head and thin body – on into adulthood.
I know they’ll be fine. It’s not as if they’re babies. They’re all quite self sufficient (they’ve had to be with my health.) And my hubby is a gem at times like these. Even with his mountain of work, he’ll cope wonderfully as he always does.
The tiny wooden PP spool tucked into the cluster, reminds me how my mum was always knitting, sewing or mending something. Idleness was not to be had, although in later years, she did come to appreciate going for coffee and having a pedicure on special occasions.
2. HireYourVirtualAssistant.com
It looks a bit awkward when I slip on the armwarmers, but they keep me warm when my workspace gets chilly.
…not to be confused with Hunan…or Hainan. Or Yunan. (Or since it’s Purim: Haman.)
Dogfish Head 90 min Imperial IPA 7.5
Yesterday. Enter voice-to-skull and a dozen or so reasons why I should just kill myself. These came flooding in nearly directly after receiving word (via email). Probably ten or fifteen minutes afterward.
It is his weekend time to drink a pot of coffee, and get caught up on email and the blog,
The commissioning editor builds the list. That's not writing down things to do that then never get done, like our own lists. It's thinking up and acquiring books that make a collection with coherence and integrity. Sounds posh, doesn't it? The commissioning editor commissions books either by deciding they want a certain book and looking for an author to write it, or by looking at proposals that come in and picking from them.
Relight Rule No. 10: Proceed with caution — finally, are you getting back together for the sake children? Think long and hard. Of course your children would've taken your breakup badly. And maybe they're finding it hard to adjust to the status quo.
If the NHS, already under attack, has to make cuts they should be slashing IT and management budgets, not medication and front line medical staff budgets.
Makdessi added that Annan’s speeches at the UN Security Council were interpreted that Syria has pledged to withdraw troops from cities on April 10th, affirming that it is a wrong interpretation, especially that Annan has not offered written guarantees to the Syrian government that the armed groups agreed to stop violence, nor has he offered guarantees that Qatar, Saudi Arabia and Turkey will commit to stop funding and arming terrorist groups.
National Honor Society will meet in 103 after school on Wednesday 4/25.
This year, the spirit of SXSW found its essence in the use of homeless people as human WiFi Hot Spots. Not only did this idea capture the wonderful spirit of SXSW, it also demonstrated our commitment to our core values:
“I’m not sure,” said Dr. Leena Jones, who performed an examination that included jabbing at suspicious areas with a pointy metal thing. “Sometimes, cavities can develop quite quickly.”
We had to figure out a uniform way to discuss a concept that we didn’t even agree on. For so long, I confused justice with retaliation and revenge. But in my new social and psychic evolutionary state, I had absolutely no clue what to tell my daughter as my concept of justice was in flux. My wife comes from a profoundly religious background, but she was moving towards a more holistic spirituality, so her ideas around what is just were also changing. Why in the hell did we have to explain heavy-duty concepts so early in the game? As neither my wife, nor myself have parents, we’ve already had to explain death to our daughter after she asked about her grandmother and grandfather—her mother told her about heaven, and I told her about dirt and worms—can we get a break?
Hard to believe it's been 3 years.
What's a fruit lambic supposed to taste like? Let's turn to Jackson:
I guess it could go either way.
As it was explained to us, not everyone that attends these Medical Brigade Clinics is ill. However, these folks live in very rural areas, sometimes barely accessible, and can be cut off during the rainy season. And so this is the opportunity for folks to get a check-up, to see a doctor, have a new baby examined…
The tunnel twist and turned at sharp angles, and every few paces Kostya stepped down over a short ledge. Sweat, dripped down Kostya’s forehead and the longed to be able to remove the thermal lining within his suit. But he pressed on, deeper into the tunnel.
“These are important metrics to track as they all contribute to or erode financial success and the long-term viability of the enterprise.
Herzog asks one of the archeologists why the cave artist made these drawings, was he perhaps like us moderns, and the archeologist answered with the cliché about the desire to communicate with the future. The answer to Herzog’s question, I think, is yes, the cave artist was like us in his confrontation with his own consciousness. His worldview, like everybody else’s at the time, blurred the line between reality and dream, between thought and action, between wish and deed, between the subjective and the objective, and between the image and the concrete thing. We still do this. The guy with the crooked little finger was probably terrified by his ability to conjure such images of reality with his charcoal stick. We are not so terrified any more. We have developed techniques that allow us to squarely look at the workings of our imagination, our ability to create symbols and images that manipulate the behavior of our fellow humans, who still can’t tell the difference between thought and reality, between the subjective and the objective, etc. We are now looking at how our minds invent “reality.” The guy with the little finger got us started on that path.
My pulse thrums like summer rain;
movie itself. Back in the '60s, one of my cousins had the CORGI TOYS
But by the time they did- TMZ was live on the scene with even more details.
The teatowels came in a pack of two.. even more proof that this was the right choice! The next thing to do was to raid the stash drawer and see what waste canvas I had hiding in there. I found some 14ct but that would have been too small to stitch the design in the middle of the teatowel, so after searching a bit more I located some 8.5ct DMC waste canvas that I must have bought about 20 years ago and never used! Perfect! Nice big Snowman for the middle of the teatowel.
tinge the western sky.
Silent Light – sunrise
- She knows that sitting in the driver's seat of the car, she should put the key in the ignition. Yes, this is so thrilling to me.
*looks over article* Oh dear. I think I might’ve gone a wee bit long. I think I'll be bowing out now before I go another page or two. But not before I send a big thanks to my pal Cranny for allowing me to post my nonsense on his page. I'm truly not worthy of taking up such a coveted spot. Thanks Cranny!
Yet the MNLA rebellion, launched only two months prior, was just the latest of several grave threats to Touré’s government, and in the final analysis it may not even have been the most significant in his overthrow. Coup leader Captain Amadou Sanogo claimed that he and his soldiers were motivated by a desire for reform – ”not of the army, of the state.” He cited structural problems: widespread corruption and nepotism in government, a dysfunctional public education system, and chronic unemployment. “You’ll agree with me,” he told his interviewer, “that the state was not working at any level.”
I bet this was alright at the home brew competition, but here it's odd. Too much going on to be an old ale, I think.
Eshkol Regional Council Head Haim Yalin said in response: “This is the fourth time they fire mortar shells containing white phosphorous. We will complain to the United Nations, as we have done in the past, after we receive all the details.”
I’ve received this award before, and truthfully, I’ve no idea how it started or how you are supposed to pick people to pass it on to. When I googled Versatile Blogger Award, I discovered it has its own WordPress blog. Here.
The US One Direction is comprised of five members: lead singer Sean O'Leary, drummer Adam Davis and guitarists Isaiah Chavez-Pickett, Tyler Rodriguez and Scott Nagareda. The band was formed at school by O'Leary and Davis in late 2009 with the other members later joining. To date, the band mostly plays at local fairs and bars in California. They have released two albums (One Direction and The Light) and numerous singles but, to date, these have failed to have a significant impact on the US Billboard Charts.
We are spending tonight with dearest friends and precious family...this is such a special time for our family...we'll open presents and eat a wonderful meal together, but will always hold dear and remember the real meaning of Christmas...the birthday of Jesus...the greatest present of all :)
So I gave him the only gift I could think of: a poem. Yup, I less than a month after we'd started dating, I wrote him a love sonnet. And not just any old sonnet. A sonnet that said I wanted to grow old with him, spend the rest of my life with him. You know the kind--the stalking sonnet that would scare any sane guy away in a heartbeat (or a quick read-thru, anyway).
“Nah,” said Hank, “I don’t go for superstitious crap like that.” Hank looked over at Chris, still standing by the sunroom doors. “What are you looking at?”
Angela is terrified of loosing the only true friend she’s ever had. As a result of her fear, Angela begins to interpret Megan’s increasingly upsetting behaviors as signs of her friend’s creative nature rather than what they really are: the early and complex signs of a troubled and deeply disturbed teenage girl.
When God made man in His image and set him on earth, He gave him knowledge of all life and the power to control it. Over the years our upbringing has set limits on this knowledge and has thus set limits on our potentials. So to open your world a bit I have come up with a few statements to open your eyes and heart to real life.
“Tell me, Nibras. How did it happen?”
Sometimes the spirit of a written work can be lost in translation to a different media and while I haven’t read the books, from what I’ve seen of them this film does a good job of capturing the feel of Scott Pilgrim’s world.
Focus: The Art Institute of Chicago
Obviously, there would be little merit in simply regurgitating her former band’s trademark sound.
The current state of American public policy can best be described as a stalemate: progressives have been stalled on further stimulus efforts; at the same time, conservatives came into power pledging opposition against any cut to a single-payer government health insurance program, and there’s little public stomach for virtually all spending cuts.
As we have quite a large amount of photos (I got a bit too trigger happy), please bear with us as we plough through them to bring you the best ones.
Most recently, I noticed an increased severity in my “splitting“. Rationally, I can see that I’m being ridiculous, but I’m unable to stop the way I’m feeling. The most “ridiculous” example of the severity of my splitting happened about 3 days ago. Chester Bennington, lead singer of my favourite band made a comment regarding how the band’s writing process and music was “schizophrenic” and it was like different personalities. Obviously, his use of schizophrenic was erroneous, but it lead to me having really hurt feelings and no longer being able to even listen to that band. (baring in mind I had been listening to them all day every day for the past 8 weeks)
a. “Sit” – Hebrew “dwell”
So the whole point of today's post is to talk about what I want to make for dinner tonight. I love how there are so many things you can do with chicken. I am going to attempt to make coconut chicken. Of course I found the recipe on Pinterest & none of the recipes have failed me yet so I am sure it will be yummy in my tummy. Chris & I are both suckers for coconut so I thought I would give it a try.
So here's a few of the latest CF related layouts I've made, just in time for CF Awareness Month. I used Noel Mignon's kit Homespun for all. Enjoy!
Episode 21. We have reached the penultimate episode, the first part of the finale, the climax of this show.
He gave me a wink (a regular habit, almost like a tic) and said, “Oh, yes, very many parties.”
As it was designed to do from the start for reasons you’ll discover once you open your eyes to see reality for what it really is.
great to get to display all their fantastic projects!
At 7 years, 10.4 percent of white, 23.4 percent of black and 14.9 percent of Hispanic girls had enough breast development to be considered at the onset of puberty.
Being new to the “mom situation,” I have learned so much in such a short time! Being the teacher type, I am constantly researching, reading, learning and practicing things. Some things work, some things don’t, some opinions are way over-the-top, and other opinions are helpful.
The panels have been hard at work evaluating the finalists, discussing the merits of each book and making hard choices about which one they all agree upon as the best in its category. The Cybils winners will be announced this Tuesday, February 14th. This year I have had the honor of coordinating the Book App category. We've had fantastic members of each panel, and they've evaluated over 50 book apps. They've considered the stories, the interactive features, the audio narration and the overall kid appeal of these apps. We've had fascinating discussions, and I think we've all learned something from the process.
Written in 1989 by legendary U.K. singer/songwriter Harper (close friend of
“Mom” he yelled down the winding staircase.
starting a new job in a weeks means i need some new clothes. i went bra shopping the other day. i hate bra shopping, but omg, i fell in love w/ the bras i got. nothing extravagant mind you, they're playtex, but they are so damn comfortable.
First, what is the big idea at play here? Society, they say, is broken. The culprits: the uninterrupted growth of the state, which now reaches into every aspect of our lives, becoming increasingly centralized, authoritarian and remote; free market capitalism that has given free rein to greed and to corporations with no loyalties to community or country; and the glorification of the individual and a narrow notion of freedom that has turned us into atomised consumers, undermining our sense of responsibility to one another. The results: rising inequality and plutocracy, loss of community and mutuality, the hollowing out of civil society, and ultimately, the loss of meaning and civic virtue. This is Putnam on steroids. We aren’t just bowling alone, we are helplessly alone in the face of an increasingly authoritarian state, greed-driven monopoly capitalism and a world of selfish competition.
Once Half and Full were off, they opened the 5K Corral and we began our race. Although there was rain on the horizon, it stayed dry for the entire 3.1 miles that I ran and the weather conditions were perfect. Not too hot…not too cold—beautiful even.
